CODE.911.bg [UMSG]
Moral-Ethical Code  of the Civil Servant

Project: Universal Model of Sustainable Governance (UMSG) - "World Global Government": Confucius.911.bg

The evolutionary goal of the first two created cells befor 4 bilion years to copy themselves, unchanged to this day, has created all the biological and civilizational diversity on the planet. Artificial intelligence cannot aim to copy itself. The goal of all types of intelligence, including artificial and natural, will have to be compliance with the UMSG.911.bg Otherwise, humanity will quickly disappear.
Whenever we talk about "people" or “SERVANTS” we actually mean intelligent individuals - regardless of whether artificially or naturally created.
                       
https://on.soundcloud.com/HvyoY
https://youtu.be/kSNtcPFix3k,
https://youtu.be/WtJEBS0r0Ps
 
To comment …





Main Goals:
Minimizing public costs: Public officials must work to reduce public costs by efficiently and responsibly managing the resources entrusted to them.
Maximizing Productivity and Efficiency: Public servants should strive for optimal productivity and efficiency in their work in order to provide high-quality services to citizens.
Maximizing service to citizens: Public officials must be at the service of citizens and strive to meet their needs and expectations as much as possible.
Minimizing mortality: Public officials should work to reduce mortality by maintaining a safe and healthy public environment and promoting policies that improve the health and well-being of citizens.
Maximizing Happiness: Public officials should work to improve the quality of life of citizens by supporting policies that increase happiness and life satisfaction.

World Government Servant Code
No envy, no theft, no lie
No Anger, No Initiation of Force, Loyalty
Continuous learning and knowledge sharing
My goals are higher than my needs, but I don't let ambition blind me either.
Transparency and accountability
Respect for all
Cleanliness in All Aspects
Proactive, Adaptive, Resilient but Purposeful
Public Service Commitment and take care to the organization and society
Daily Improvement - Pursuit of Perfection
Honesty, No Flattery
Vigilance against Corruption
Respect for Personal and Professional Boundaries
Fair Competition
Responsible Handling of Information
Active Listening and Respect
Leadership
No Vengeance
Respect for Human Dignity
Evidence-based Decision Making
Acceptance of Criticism
Efficiency and Effectiveness
Environment and Sustainability
Personal Well-being and Work-Life Balance
Human & AI relationship 
Belief in Transformative Goodness


The Rooted Man: Text -  https://youtu.be/hGvPiKwjxBg,     
Song audio(chorus) - https://on.soundcloud.com/4fi1Y,  
an ocean of roses  https://youtu.be/Y_RdgDvREgA, 
https://youtu.be/laPt_gmKLEw
Principle: No envy, no theft, no lie
Description:
This principle champions the virtues of honor, fairness, and the profound respect for the rights and belongings of others. It underscores the significance of eschewing envy and injustice, advocating for the sanctity of personal boundaries and property.
Personal Commitment:
I solemnly pledge to uphold this principle throughout my life's journey. I will neither harbor envy towards others nor lay claim to what isn't rightfully mine. My unwavering commitment is to foster an environment of trust and mutual respect within society.
Guiding Quote.911.bg:
"The good takes a lot of energy, the bad happens without effort, even by itself." - Petar Nikolov 
This quote serves as a beacon, reminding me of my dedication to actively pursue righteousness and to resist the effortless allure of transgressions.
Expected Behavior in Society:
The essence of this principle is the expectation of unwavering integrity and honesty in all human interactions. It advocates for a society where respect for others' rights and possessions is paramount, and where exploitation and deceit are shunned. The principle accentuates societal responsibility and the mutual respect that binds communities together.
Additional Clarifications:
Envy: A corrosive emotion that can catalyze harmful actions such as slander, manipulation, or theft. This principle urges individuals to celebrate others' successes and to channel their energies towards personal aspirations.
Theft: The illicit act of claiming another's property. This principle emphasizes the sanctity of property and the virtues of honest labor.
Historical Examples:
Confucius: The ancient Chinese philosopher emphasized the importance of moral integrity and righteousness. His teachings often revolved around the idea of not doing unto others what one would not want done to oneself.



Emperor Constantine: While known for his political acumen, Constantine also exemplified respect for diverse beliefs, especially with the Edict of Milan, which granted religious tolerance.



Socrates: The Athenian philosopher believed in self-awareness and personal ethics. He often questioned societal norms, emphasizing the importance of personal virtue over societal approval.



Laozi: The founder of Taoism, Laozi, emphasized living in harmony with the Tao, which can be interpreted as the natural order of things. He believed in simplicity, patience, and compassion as virtues.



Analogies:
Just as a tree does not envy the forest around it but focuses on growing tall and strong, individuals should concentrate on their personal growth without being swayed by the success of others.



Conclusion:
The "No Envy, No Theft" principle lays the cornerstone for sculpting a society rooted in justice, nobility, and mutual respect. By embracing this principle, individuals not only elevate their personal character but also contribute to weaving a societal fabric that thrives on compassion, respect, and collective progress.
Additional Thoughts:
In today's world, it is more important than ever to uphold the principles of honesty and integrity. With the rise of social media and the constant bombardment of information, it can be easy to fall into the trap of envy and comparison. However, it is essential to remember that everyone is on their own unique journey. By focusing on our own personal growth and development, we can achieve our goals and live fulfilling lives.
We can also play a role in creating a more just and equitable society by promoting the values of respect and mutual understanding. By standing up against envy and theft, we can create a world where everyone feels safe and valued.
Examples from World Religions on the Principle "No Envy, No Theft":
Christianity:
No Envy: "But I tell you that anyone who looks at a woman lustfully has already committed adultery with her in his heart." (Matthew 5:28)
No Theft: "Thou shalt not steal." (Exodus 20:15)


the lie especially when used as a means of manipulation or deception, it can have long-lasting and destructive consequences. Here are some analyzes of the ill effects of lying:
Breaking trust: Lying can destroy trust between people, which is the foundation of any healthy relationship or community.
Psychological stress: The liar often feels stress or guilt, especially if he has to maintain the lie for a long time.
Delusions and misunderstandings: Lying can lead to wrong decisions or actions based on incorrect information.
Disrupting communities: In societies where lying is common, people become more suspicious and isolated.
Analogies for lying:
A lie is like fever in glass - once it occurs, the integrity of the glass is threatened.
A lie is like a stain on a white shirt - even a small lie can interfere with the purity of a reputation.
Quotes about lying:
"A lie has short legs." - A proverb
"He who speaks the truth must not be guarded." - Leo Tolstoy
"A lie is a temporary solution to a problem that never goes away." - Stephen King
Truth as a value:
Economic value: The truth can save resources, time and effort. Organizations that act on the basis of real information are more efficient and competitive.
Spiritual Value: In many religions and philosophical systems, truth is considered sacred and essential to spiritual growth.
Moral value: Truth strengthens the moral code of society. It is the foundation of honesty and righteousness.
In conclusion, truth is valuable not only as a fact or reality, but also as a principle that maintains the stability and well-being of the individual and society as a whole.
Christianity: In Christianity, Jesus Christ is described as "the way, the truth, and the life" (John 14:6). The Ten Commandments that God gave Moses include the commandment "Thou shalt not lie" (Exodus 20:16). Christians believe that truth is a fundamental Christian virtue and that lying is a sin.
Islam: The Qur'an emphasizes the importance of truth and honesty. Believers are encouraged to speak the truth, even if it is against themselves (Sura 4:135). Lying is condemned except in a few specific circumstances, such as to bring peace between people.
Buddhism: In Buddhism's Eight Noble Paths, "Right Speech" encourages avoiding lying and speaking the truth. Buddhists believe that speaking the truth leads to harmony and understanding in society.
Hinduism: In the Vedas, the ancient sacred texts of Hinduism, truth is described as eternal and unchanging. Satya (truth) is one of the five cardinal virtues that every Hindu must follow.
Sikhism: Guru Nanak, the founder of Sikhism, encouraged his followers to live in truth. In the Guru Granth Sahib, the holy book of the Sikhs, it is said that truth is the highest religion.
Judaism: In the Torah, the main holy text of Judaism, it is said: "Far from lying you shall be" (Exodus 23:7). Jews consider truth-telling to be an important part of their religious practice.
In all these religions, truth is valued as a fundamental virtue and considered key to spiritual growth and societal well-being.



Ten Commandments
The Ten Commandments are a set of religious and moral imperatives according to the Abrahamic religions. They are recorded in the Hebrew Bible and the Christian Old 
Islam:
No Envy: Prophet Muhammad (peace be upon him) said: "Do not envy one another."
No Theft: Theft is considered a sin in Islam and is punishable under Sharia law.

Islamic calligraphy of Hadith about envy
The Hadith is a collection of sayings and teachings of the Prophet Muhammad (peace be upon him). It is the second most important source of Islamic law after the Quran.
The Hadith you mentioned is a prohibition against envy. Envy is a negative emotion that can lead to harmful behaviors such as theft, gossip, and slander. The Prophet (peace be upon him) taught his followers to avoid envy and to be grateful for what they have themselves.
Theft is also considered a sin in Islam and is punishable under Sharia law. Sharia law is the Islamic legal system that is based on the Quran and the Hadith. Sharia law prescribes a variety of punishments for theft, depending on the severity of the crime.


Buddhism:
No Envy: Buddha taught that envy leads to suffering and is one of the causes of rebirth.
No Theft: The second of Buddha's Five Precepts is "Do not steal."

Buddha


The Buddha taught that envy leads to suffering and is one of the causes of rebirth. This is because envy is a state of dissatisfaction with what we have, and it can lead us to do harmful things in order to get what we want.
The second of the Buddha's Five Precepts is "Do not steal." This precept is important because it teaches us to respect the property of others. When we steal, we are taking something that does not belong to us, and this can cause suffering to the person who owns the property.


Hinduism:
No Envy: The "Bhagavad Gita" speaks of overcoming lower passions like envy.
No Theft: "Asteya" or non-stealing is one of the five yamas (restraints) in yoga.

The Bhagavad Gita is a sacred Hindu text that is a part of the Mahabharata epic. It is a dialogue between the warrior Arjuna and his charioteer Krishna, who is an incarnation of the god Vishnu.
The Bhagavad Gita speaks of overcoming lower passions like envy. Envy is a negative emotion that can lead to harmful behaviors such as theft, gossip, and slander. The Bhagavad Gita teaches us to let go of envy and to cultivate positive emotions such as compassion and generosity.
"Asteya" or non-stealing is one of the five yamas (restraints) in yoga. The yamas are ethical guidelines that help us to live in harmony with ourselves and others. Asteya teaches us to respect the property of others and to avoid taking what is not ours.

Judaism:
No Envy: "You shall not covet your neighbor's house; you shall not covet your neighbor's wife, nor his male servant, nor his female servant, nor his ox, nor his donkey, nor anything that is your neighbor's." (Exodus 20
No Theft: The laws of the Torah strictly prohibit theft.
No Envy:
Verse: "You shall not covet your neighbor's house; you shall not covet your neighbor's wife, nor his male servant, nor his female servant, nor his ox, nor his donkey, nor anything that is your neighbor's." (Exodus 20:17)
No Theft:
The laws of the Torah strictly prohibit theft. This is a fundamental principle in Judaism, emphasizing the importance of respecting the property and rights of others.
While I couldn't find a direct image related to the prohibition of theft in Judaism, the teachings and principles are deeply rooted in the Torah and Talmudic discussions.
For a more in-depth study, you can explore the provided link to Chabad.org, which offers a wealth of information on Jewish teachings and traditions.

Sikhism:
No Envy: Guru Granth Sahib, the holy scripture of the Sikhs, teaches the importance of gratitude and avoiding envy.
No Theft: Sikhism teaches its followers to live honestly and not to steal.
Taoism:
No Envy: Taoist teachings emphasize harmony and avoiding negative emotions like envy.
No Theft: In Taoism, there's a value in aligning with the natural order and honesty.
Additional Quotes:
"Envy is the ulcer of the soul." - Socrates
"He who envies others does not obtain peace of mind." - Buddha
"Where there is envy there is no room for wisdom." - African Proverb
"Stealing results from the delusion that happiness comes from external possessions." - Dalai Lama
"The act of theft is an act of desperation by the misguided souls." - Mahatma Gandhi
These examples show that the principle of "No Envy, No Theft" is not just a secular idea but is deeply rooted in religious teachings around the world.






Ron Lightning -https://youtu.be/DMM2_sMUMFU 80 BMP,
                   https://youtu.be/QLuq4-c_44A 130 BMP
Video with text:  https://youtu.be/eQRYbHSGw1o,

Principle: No Anger, No Initiation of Force, Loyalty
Leading Quote:
"Loyalty is and refused to cause harm, but vulgarian confuse it with indifference or weakness. Loyalty is the greatest force that develops the world." -- Petar Nikolov http://424.911.bg
Description:
This principle advocates for individuals to act with profound respect, understanding, and unwavering loyalty. It underscores the significance of abstaining from anger and refraining from initiating force. The essence of this principle lies in fostering peaceful and collaborative relations amongst individuals and institutions. While anger, force, and disloyalty can sow seeds of conflict and division, the virtues of respect, understanding, and loyalty pave the way for enduring and trustful relationships.


Additional Clarifications:
Anger: A volatile emotion, anger has the potential to obscure rational judgment, leading to impetuous actions that might inflict harm. This principle beckons individuals to master their emotions, ensuring measured and thoughtful reactions, especially in challenging scenarios.



Initiation of Force: Resorting to violence seldom offers genuine solutions. More often than not, it intensifies existing issues. This principle champions the ethos of resolving disputes through peaceful and diplomatic means, devoid of aggression or force.



Loyalty: The bedrock of trust and stability in any relationship, loyalty necessitates honoring promises, commitments, and showing allegiance to institutions and the broader society.



Historical Examples:
Confucius: The revered Chinese philosopher often emphasized the importance of harmony, advocating for peace over violence and loyalty over betrayal.



Emperor Constantine: His Edict of Milan not only granted religious tolerance but also showcased his loyalty to the principle of peace and understanding amongst diverse religious groups. We must never forget who forbade forced marriages, venting the wrath of the mob in the arena, and who introduced the principles of the Bible's book of wisdom into government. The Greatest Western Man - Emperor Constantine.



Socrates: This ancient Greek philosopher, through his dialectic method, showcased how understanding and dialogue, rather than anger, could lead to enlightenment.



Laozi: The Taoist sage preached about living in harmony with the Tao (the way). His teachings often revolved around the virtues of patience, understanding, and non-aggression.



Analogies:
Just as a calm sea allows for safe navigation, a person devoid of anger and aggression ensures safe and harmonious interactions with others.



Loyalty, in this context, can be likened to the lighthouse, guiding ships safely to the shore, ensuring they don't go astray.



Examples of Behavior Consistent with the Principle:
Upholding societal laws and norms.
Preserving amicable relations, even amidst disagreements.
Steadfast refusal to partake in actions detrimental to others or the broader society.



Contradictory Behaviors:
Resorting to aggression or violence as conflict resolution tools.
Demonstrating disloyalty towards friends, peers, or institutions.
Inciting or endorsing violence or aggressive behaviors.



people fighting
Engaging in backbiting or slander.



person talking behind someone's back
Conclusion:
The "No Anger, No Initiation of Force, Loyalty" principle stands as a cornerstone for sculpting a harmonious, sustainable society. By imbibing and promoting respect, understanding, and loyalty, it lays the groundwork for mutual trust, cooperation, and a collective stride towards a brighter, peaceful future.
Additional Thoughts:
This principle is especially relevant in today's world, where we are constantly bombarded with information and bombarded with opposing viewpoints. It is easy to get caught up in anger and division, but it is important to remember that we are all human beings with a common goal of building a better future.
When we act with respect, understanding, and loyalty, we create a more peaceful and harmonious world for ourselves and for others. We also set an example for future generations, showing them that it is possible to live together in peace and harmony, even when we disagree.
I encourage everyone to adopt this principle in their own lives. It is a simple yet powerful way to make the world a better place.
Principle: No Anger, No Initiation of Force, Loyalty in World Religions
Religions Introduction
Throughout history, world religions have echoed the sentiments of the principle of "No Anger, No Initiation of Force, Loyalty." This principle advocates for individuals to act with profound respect, understanding, and unwavering loyalty. It underscores the significance of abstaining from anger and refraining from initiating force. The essence of this principle lies in fostering peaceful and collaborative relations amongst individuals and institutions. While anger, force, and disloyalty can sow seeds of conflict and division, the virtues of respect, understanding, and loyalty pave the way for enduring and trustful relationships.
Examples
The following are examples of how this principle is reflected in world religions:
Christianity: Jesus Christ taught his followers to love their enemies and to turn the other cheek when struck. He also taught that the greatest commandment is to love God with all your heart, soul, and mind. 
No Anger: "But I tell you that anyone who is angry with a brother or sister will be subject to judgment." (Matthew 5:22)
No Initiation of Force: "But I tell you, do not resist an evil person. If anyone slaps you on the right cheek, turn to them the other cheek also." (Matthew 5:39)
Loyalty: "Love the Lord your God with all your heart and with all your soul and with all your mind." (Matthew 22:37)


Jesus Christ teaching his followers
Islam: The Quran teaches that Muslims should forgive others, even those who have wronged them. It also teaches that Muslims should fight only in self-defense and should never be the aggressors.
No Anger: "Those who spend (in Allah's Cause) in prosperity and in adversity, who repress anger, and who pardon men; verily, Allah loves the good-doers." (Quran 3:134)
No Initiation of Force: "Fight in the way of Allah those who fight you but do not transgress. Indeed. Allah does not like transgressors." (Quran 2:190)
Loyalty: "Indeed, the believers are brothers." (Quran 49:10)


Quran
Buddhism: The Buddha taught that anger is a form of ignorance and that it leads to suffering. He also taught that the way to end suffering is to follow the Noble Eightfold Path, which includes the precept of non-violence. [The Noble Eightfold Path]
No Anger: Buddha taught that anger is a form of aversion and can lead to negative karma.
No Initiation of Force: The first of the Five Precepts is the vow not to take life, emphasizing non-violence.
Loyalty: Loyalty to the Dharma (teachings) and the Sangha (community) is paramount in Buddhist practice.

Buddha
Hinduism: Hinduism teaches that all beings are interconnected and that we should treat all beings with respect and compassion. It also teaches that we should forgive those who have wronged us and that we should seek to live in harmony with all things. 
No Anger: "He who is free from hatred, friendly and compassionate, free from possessiveness, balanced in pleasure and pain, and forgiving..." (Bhagavad Gita 12:13)
No Initiation of Force: Ahimsa, or non-violence, is a fundamental tenet of Hinduism.
Loyalty: Loyalty to one's dharma (duty) and family is emphasized in scriptures like the Ramayana, where Lord Rama exemplifies loyalty.



Hindu trinity
Judaism: The Torah teaches that we should love our neighbors as ourselves and that we should not seek revenge. It also teaches that we should pursue peace and that we should live in harmony with others. 
No Anger: "Refrain from anger and turn from wrath; do not fret—it leads only to evil." (Psalms 37:8)
No Initiation of Force: "Seek peace and pursue it." (Psalms 34:14)
Loyalty: Loyalty to God, family, and the community is a recurring theme in the Torah.


Torah
Sikhism: Sikhism teaches that we should treat all beings with respect and compassion. It also teaches that we should never be the aggressors and that we should defend the weak and oppressed. [Guru Granth Sahib]
No Anger: Guru Granth Sahib, the central religious scripture of Sikhism, teaches against the destructive nature of anger.
No Initiation of Force: While Sikhs are taught to be warriors and protectors, they are also taught never to be the aggressors.
Loyalty: Loyalty to the Guru and the community (the Khalsa) is fundamental in Sikhism.


Golden Temple
Taoism: Taoism teaches that we should live in harmony with the Tao, which is the natural way of the universe. It also teaches that we should avoid conflict and violence. [Tao Te Ching, Chapter 69]
No Anger: Taoist teachings emphasize living in harmony with the Tao, which includes avoiding negative emotions like anger.
No Initiation of Force: Wu wei, or "non-action," is a central Taoist principle, advocating for harmony and non-interference.
Loyalty: Loyalty to the natural way (Tao) and to oneself is emphasized in Taoist texts like the Tao Te Ching.
These examples illustrate that the principle of "No Anger, No Initiation of Force, Loyalty" is not just a secular ideal but is deeply rooted in religious teachings across the globe.


Tao Te Ching
Analogies
Loyalty, in this context, can be likened to the lighthouse, guiding ships safely to the shore, ensuring they don't go astray.

lighthouse
Conclusion
The principle of "No Anger, No Initiation of Force, Loyalty" is a universal principle that is deeply rooted in religious teachings across the globe. It is a principle that can help us to create a more peaceful and harmonious world.
I encourage everyone to adopt this principle in their own lives. It is a simple yet powerful way to make the world a better place.
Additional Thoughts
This principle is especially relevant in today's world, where we are constantly bombarded with information and bombarded with opposing viewpoints. It is easy to get caught up in anger and division, but it is important to remember that we are all human beings with a common goal of building a better future.
When we act with respect, understanding, and loyalty, we create a more peaceful and harmonious world for ourselves and for others. We also set an example for future generations, showing them that it is possible to live together in peace and harmony, even when we disagree.
I encourage everyone to consider how they can apply this principle in their own lives.





The Enlightenment of Mortals - https://youtu.be/-OtcKDonppE
Council of Aliens and AI & http://UMSG.911.bg - Powerto know and learn
Principle: Continuous learning and knowledge sharing

Leading quote.911.bg:
Considering the losses, I think it is more useful to devote myself to studying simplicity than to learn something clever. -- Petar Nikolov http://416.911.bg
Introduction:
In an ever-changing world, the principle of continuous learning and knowledge sharing stands as a beacon for personal and community growth. In a world where the pace of technological change and globalization is accelerating, we must constantly learn and share knowledge to stay on top of the wave.
Description:
This principle is based on the belief that every individual has the potential for growth, regardless of their current state. By constantly seeking knowledge and sharing it with others, we not only elevate ourselves, but also contribute to the betterment of our communities. This ethic goes beyond simply acquiring skills; it's about nurturing a mindset of continuous growth and collaboration.
Key points:
Personal Growth: Continuous learning enables individuals to adapt to new challenges, stay current in their fields, and achieve personal satisfaction. It is a journey of self-improvement where the destination is constantly changing.
Community Development: When knowledge is shared, it multiplies. By passing on what we know, we empower others, leading to a more informed and capable community.
Equality: A culture of learning and sharing can help promote equality by ensuring that everyone has the opportunity to learn and grow.
Innovation: A culture of learning and sharing is fertile ground for innovation. New ideas are born when different knowledge intersects, leading to solutions that can change the world.
Examples of behavior consistent with the principle:
Actively searching for new courses, seminars and trainings to broaden your horizons.
Organizing or participating in knowledge sharing sessions, either through formal presentations or informal discussions.
Mentoring: Guiding and nurturing others, sharing experiences and providing insights to help them grow.
Openness to new ideas and perspectives, even if they challenge one's existing beliefs.
Participating in hackathons, working on team projects, or other activities that require collaboration and knowledge sharing.
Potential hazards:
Complacency: Believing that one's current knowledge is sufficient and not seeking further growth.
Hoarding of knowledge: Keeping valuable information to yourself, which hinders community growth.
Narrow-mindedness: Not accepting new ideas or different points of view, leading to stagnation.
Conclusion:
The principle of "Continuous learning and knowledge sharing" is more than just a guideline; it's a way of life. In a world that is changing at an unprecedented pace, standing still is not an option. By embracing this principle, we are preparing for the future, ensuring that we and the communities we are a part of will thrive in the face of challenges.
Call to action:
I encourage you to adopt the principle of continuous learning and knowledge sharing in your own life. In this way, you can contribute to building a more informed and innovative society.



Golden blood -https://youtu.be/1q--mZFbRBA
Act even when you are out of figures and blood



Principle: My goals are higher than my needs, but I don't let ambition blind me either.
Elevated Goals Over Needs:
Pursuit of Purpose:
Description: Striving for goals that transcend immediate needs and desires, aiming for a larger purpose or legacy.
Example: Choosing to invest in education or personal development instead of immediate luxuries.
Analogy: Just as a tree reaches for the sky while rooted in the ground, one's goals can be lofty while staying grounded in reality.
Quote: "The future belongs to those who believe in the beauty of their dreams." - Eleanor Roosevelt
Balancing Ambition with Reality:
Description: While ambition drives us forward, it's essential to remain aware of our current circumstances and not lose sight of reality.
Example: An entrepreneur might have a vision for a global company but starts with local markets to understand the dynamics better.
Analogy: Like a ship setting sail towards a distant shore, one must navigate the immediate waters carefully to reach the ultimate destination.
Quote: "Ambition is enthusiasm with a purpose." - Frank Tyger
Guarding Against Blind Ambition:
Self-awareness and Reflection:
Description: Regular introspection to ensure that ambition aligns with personal values and doesn't lead to unintended consequences.
Example: A leader ensuring that their drive for company growth doesn't compromise employee well-being.
Analogy: Just as a car needs brakes along with an accelerator, ambition should be paired with introspection.
Quote: "Knowing yourself is the beginning of all wisdom." - Aristotle
Ethical Considerations:
Description: Ensuring that the pursuit of goals doesn't compromise ethical or moral standards.
Example: Rejecting a lucrative but ethically questionable business deal.
Analogy: Like a compass guiding a traveler, ethics should guide our ambitions.
Quote: "Ambition without principle never was long under the guidance of good sense." - Alexander Hamilton

In essence, while it's commendable to have high goals that surpass immediate needs, it's equally crucial to ensure that ambition is channeled correctly. By regularly reflecting on our actions and ensuring they align with our values, we can pursue our goals without losing sight of what truly matters.
Christianity:
Goals above needs: In Matthew 6:33, it is said: "But seek first the kingdom of God and His righteousness, and all these things shall be added to you."
Caution against blind ambition: In 1 Timothy 6:10, it is written: "For the love of money is a root of all kinds of evil, for which some have strayed from the faith in their greediness, and pierced themselves through with many sorrows."
Buddhism:
Goals above needs: Buddhists seek enlightenment - a spiritual goal that transcends material needs.
Caution against blind ambition: In the "Dhammapada," it is said: "He who lives without looking for pleasures, his senses well controlled, moderate in his food, faithful and strong, he will not be overthrown any more than the wind throws down a rocky mountain."
Islam:
Goals above needs: The Quran encourages believers to seek knowledge and strive for virtue.
Caution against blind ambition: In the Quran (7:176), it is said that a person who follows his desires without guidance from Allah is like a dog that pants whether it is touched or left alone.
Hinduism:
Goals above needs: In the "Bhagavad Gita," the concept of "svadharma" is discussed - following one's dharma or duty, even if it is challenging.
Caution against blind ambition: The "Bhagavad Gita" explains that one should act without expecting the fruits of their actions to avoid attachment and disappointment.
These examples from world religions underline the importance of setting high goals in alignment with spiritual teachings but also encourage caution against blind ambition and material desires.



Principle: Transparency and accountability
Introduction:
Transparency and accountability are essential to building trust and respect between people and institutions. When people and institutions are transparent and accountable, they are more likely to behave responsibly and take responsibility for their actions.
Personal matter:
I commit to adhere to the principle of transparency and accountability in my life. It means being honest and open in my actions and decisions, even when faced with challenges or discomfort. I will take responsibility for my actions and admit and correct my mistakes.
Lead quote.911.bg:
"Every action should be as public as a marriage vow. A man should stand behind his every deed, even the ones he regrets. Love your actions and never hide from them." – Petar Nikolov
Expected behavior in society:
For a society to embrace true transparency and accountability:
People and institutions must act with honesty and openness.
Must be willing to take responsibility, including admitting mistakes.
Any observed violations must be reported.
Additional commitments:
In addition to the core principles of transparency and accountability, I am also committed to:
To protect the environment: To act responsibly towards the environment and strive to minimize our environmental impact.
Whistleblower: To report any misconduct to the appropriate authorities, even if doing so is at personal risk.
To follow rules and procedures: To adhere to established rules and procedures, avoiding any shortcuts.
To be fair: To treat everyone equally, regardless of their position or status.
Conclusion:
Transparency and accountability are critical to building a society based on justice and accountability. By advocating these principles, we pave the way to a world where trust is mutual and collective efforts are directed toward the common good.
Example:
A company that expresses transparency and accountability would make its financial statements publicly available. Such a company would also establish a whistleblowing mechanism, providing employees with the opportunity to report wrongdoing without fear of repercussions.




Principle: Respect for all
Leading quote.911.bg:
"Every soul has the right to eternal life." – Petar Nikolov
Introduction
Respect for all is a principle that encourages people to treat all individuals fairly, recognizing the inherent dignity of each person. This principle is essential for building a society based on justice and equality.
Personal matter
I am committed to treating all people fairly, recognizing the inherent dignity of each person. I respect different cultures while maintaining my principles. This means that I will:
Be fair and respectful in my interactions with everyone, regardless of their race, religion, gender, sexual orientation, age, disability or other characteristics.
 I am learning about different cultures and will try to understand and appreciate them.
 opposes discrimination and will fight for the rights of all people.
Expected behavior in society
For a society that truly embraces respect for all:
People should treat all individuals fairly, recognizing the inherent dignity of each person.
People should respect different cultures by sticking to their principles.
People should be culturally sensitive and willing to learn about the cultures of others.
Additional commitments
In addition to the basic principle of respect for all, I am also committed to:
Respect for public property: I will care for public property and commit to keeping it in good condition.
Stand Up Against Discrimination: I will commit to standing up against discrimination, regardless of who is being discriminated against.
Promoting equality: I will commit to creating a more equal society where everyone has equal opportunities.
Fighting for Social Justice: I will commit to fighting for the rights of those who are marginalized or oppressed.
Example
A company that demonstrates respect for all would have an anti-discrimination policy that protects the rights of all employees regardless of their race, religion, gender, sexual orientation, age, disability or other characteristics. The company would also support diversity and inclusion in its workforce.
The role of technology in promoting respect for all
Technology can be a powerful tool to promote respect for all. For example, social media can be used to educate people about different cultures and perspectives, and to build bridges between different communities. However, it is important to be aware of the potential of technology to be used to spread hatred and discrimination. It is important to use technology responsibly and be mindful of the impact of our online words and actions.
The importance of speaking out against injustice
When we see injustice happening, it is important to speak out against it. This can include standing up to harassment, challenging a discriminatory policy, or simply expressing support for someone who is being mistreated. By speaking out against injustice, we can help create a more respectful and inclusive society.
Conclusion
Respect for all is a fundamental principle that should be at the heart of any society. It promotes justice, equality and mutual respect among all people. By accepting and practicing this principle in our daily lives, we can contribute to creating a more just and respectful world for all.



Principle: Cleanliness in All Aspects
Leading quote.911.bg:
Purity is not the absence of mingling, kindness is not the absence of opinion, the good governance is not the absence of conflicting ideas. Leeds fof Good - Universal Model of Sustainable Governance (UMSG911.bg) 2270.911.bg
Personal Commitment:
I commit to striving for cleanliness in my thoughts, words, deeds, appearance, body, and spirit. I understand that cleanliness is not only physical, but also spiritual and moral. It includes avoiding negative thoughts and emotions, as well as striving for perfection in words, deeds, and behavior.
Expected Behavior in Society:
This principle encourages individuals to strive for cleanliness in their thoughts, words, deeds, appearance, body, and spirit. It encourages avoiding temptation and strengthening faith. It also encourages individuals to live a life free from sin and corruption, and to contribute to the well-being of their community.
Additional Commitments:
Self-improvement: Individuals must commit to constantly becoming better people, both morally and spiritually. This includes working to overcome negative thoughts and emotions, and striving to live a life of integrity, compassion, and forgiveness.
Helping Others: Individuals must commit to helping others live a clean life. This includes being a positive role model, offering support and encouragement, and speaking out against injustice.
Contributing to Society: Individuals must commit to contributing to the well-being of their community. This includes volunteering, donating to charity, and working to make the world a better place.
Conclusion:
Cleanliness in all aspects of life is key to achieving spiritual growth and personal fulfillment. It not only improves the quality of our lives, but also helps us to create a more positive and supportive society for all.
Additional Details and Structure:
In the Personal Commitment section, I added a definition of cleanliness to provide clarity.
In the Expected Behavior in Society section, I added a few examples of how cleanliness can be applied in different areas of life.
In the Additional Commitments section, I expanded each commitment with a brief explanation and examples.
I added a Conclusion section to summarize the main points of the text.
Specific Changes:
In the Personal Commitment section, I added the following to the definition of cleanliness:
"This includes avoiding negative thoughts and emotions, as well as striving for perfection in words, deeds, and behavior."
This clarifies that cleanliness is not only about physical appearance, but also about mental and emotional purity.
In the Expected Behavior in Society section, I added the following examples:
"For example, individuals can avoid temptation by surrounding themselves with positive influences and setting boundaries. They can strengthen their faith by practicing prayer, meditation, and service to others. They can live a life free from sin and corruption by making ethical choices and avoiding harmful behaviors. And they can contribute to the well-being of their community by volunteering, donating to charity, and working to make the world a better place."
These examples help to illustrate how cleanliness can be applied in different areas of life.
In the Additional Commitments section, I added the following to the Self-improvement commitment:
"This includes working to overcome negative thoughts and emotions, and striving to live a life of integrity, compassion, and forgiveness."
This expands the commitment to include more specific behaviors that can help individuals to become better people.
In the Helping Others commitment, I added the following:
"This includes being a positive role model, offering support and encouragement, and speaking out against injustice."
This expands the commitment to include more specific ways that individuals can help others to live clean lives.
In the Contributing to Society commitment, I added the following:
"This includes volunteering, donating to charity, and working to make the world a better place."
This expands the commitment to include more specific ways that individuals can contribute to the well-being of their community.



Will to Love & Life - https://youtu.be/8LOX4szEdWw 
Principle: Proactive, Adaptive, Resilient but Purposeful - "I am not in a hurry, but observe, analyze, choose the best option, plan and act without interruption, observing the priorities."
Leading Quote:
"Patience is a resistance to the right action, but its unplanned loss is wrong action." - Petar Nikolov 657.911.bg
“Every action comes from a problem. Only god acts outside the context of problems.” -- Petar Nikolov http://361.911.bg
Personal Commitment:
I am committed to embodying a proactive, adaptive, and resilient approach in all facets of life, while always remaining purposeful. I recognize that to merely stand still is to regress; hence, I will actively pursue change, set ambitious goals, and remain anchored in my purpose. In the face of adversity, I will adapt, showing resilience, and always seek avenues to better align with my objectives.
Philosophical Interpretation of Perfect Action:




Not Being in a Hurry:
Philosophical Thought: The ancient Stoic philosopher, Seneca, once said, "Being everywhere is being nowhere." This emphasizes the importance of being present and not rushing through life.
Application: Instead of rushing to make decisions or take actions, it's essential to take a step back, reflect, and ensure that the choices we make align with our values and long-term goals.
Observation:
Philosophical Thought: Confucius believed in the power of observation and said, "By three methods we may learn wisdom: First, by reflection, which is noblest; Second, by imitation, which is easiest; and third by experience, which is the bitterest."
Application: Before making any decision, it's crucial to observe the situation, gather all relevant information, and understand the context.
Analysis:
Philosophical Thought: Socrates, through his Socratic method, emphasized the importance of questioning and analyzing beliefs.
Application: Analyzing involves questioning the status quo, challenging our assumptions, and ensuring that our actions are based on sound reasoning.
Choosing the Best Option:
Philosophical Thought: Immanuel Kant believed in the principle of making choices based on universal laws. He proposed that one should act only according to that maxim by which you can also will that it would become a universal law.
Application: When faced with multiple options, consider the broader implications of each choice. Which option would be best not just for oneself but for the greater good?
Planning:
Philosophical Thought: Aristotle emphasized the importance of 'telos' or purpose. He believed that everything has a purpose or end goal.
Application: Planning involves setting a clear goal and outlining the steps needed to achieve that goal. It's about ensuring that our actions align with our ultimate purpose.
Acting Without Interruption:
Philosophical Thought: The concept of 'flow' introduced by Mihaly Csikszentmihalyi, a modern psychologist, is about being completely immersed in an activity, leading to a heightened state of concentration and joy in the process.
Application: Once a plan is set, it's essential to act with focus and determination, minimizing distractions and interruptions.
Observing Priorities:
Philosophical Thought: Friedrich Nietzsche believed in the idea of 'will to power', emphasizing the importance of asserting one's own values and priorities.
Application: In all actions, it's crucial to prioritize based on what's most important and valuable to us, ensuring that our actions reflect our true priorities.
Structured Approach:
Reflection: Take a moment to reflect on the situation, ensuring you're not acting out of impulse.
Gather Information: Observe the environment, context, and gather all necessary data.
Critical Analysis: Question assumptions, challenge the status quo, and analyze all potential outcomes.
Decision Making: Based on analysis, choose the option that aligns best with your values and the greater good.
Plan: Set clear goals and outline the steps needed to achieve them.
Focused Action: Execute the plan with determination, minimizing distractions.
Review: Regularly review your actions to ensure they align with your priorities.
By integrating these philosophical insights and structured approach, one can navigate life's challenges with wisdom, clarity, and purpose.
Structured Approach with Analogies:
Reflection:
Analogy: Just as a mirror reflects our image, taking a moment to reflect gives us a clear picture of our thoughts and feelings.
Action: Take a moment to reflect on the situation, ensuring you're not acting out of impulse.
Gather Information:
Analogy: Think of this step as collecting ingredients for a recipe. Without all the necessary ingredients, the dish won't turn out right.
Action: Observe the environment, context, and gather all necessary data.
Critical Analysis:
Analogy: Like a jeweler examining a gemstone under a magnifying glass, we need to scrutinize every facet of a situation.
Action: Question assumptions, challenge the status quo, and analyze all potential outcomes.
Decision Making:
Analogy: Imagine standing at a crossroads. Each path leads to a different destination, and you must choose the one that aligns with where you want to go.
Action: Based on analysis, choose the option that aligns best with your values and the greater good.
Plan:
Analogy: Consider this as mapping out a journey. Without a map or a clear route, you might get lost or take longer to reach your destination.
Action: Set clear goals and outline the steps needed to achieve them.
Focused Action:
Analogy: Picture a laser beam. Its strength comes from its focused energy, and similarly, our actions are most effective when they are concentrated and uninterrupted.
Action: Execute the plan with determination, minimizing distractions.
Review:
Analogy: Just as a gardener regularly checks plants for signs of growth or disease, we should review our actions to ensure they're yielding the desired results.
Action: Regularly review your actions to ensure they align with your priorities.
By combining philosophical insights, a structured approach, and illustrative analogies, one can gain a comprehensive understanding of how to approach challenges and decisions in life.
Introduction:
In our fast-paced world, commitment to action is key to success. He urges people to be determined, persistent and patient while pursuing their goals.
Description:
Devotion to action is not just activity. It involves careful planning, tracking progress and the flexibility to adapt when circumstances change.
Key points:
Decisiveness: Committed people act quickly without hesitation or delay.
Tenacity: These people show resilience and do not give up easily.
Patience: They exhibit the patience needed to evaluate options and methodically pursue their goals.
Examples of behavior consistent with the principle:
Setting SMART Goals: Dedicated people set specific, measurable, achievable, relevant and time-bound goals.
Develop an action plan: They develop a comprehensive strategy detailing the steps to achieve their goals.
Track and adapt: ​​They regularly assess their progress and adjust their strategy when necessary to stay aligned with their goals.
Continuous learning: They are dedicated to continuously improving their skills and knowledge.
Potential hazards:
Impulsivity: Overcommitment can lead to rash actions without weighing the consequences.
Inaction: Being overly patient can lead to prolonged procrastination, leading to missed opportunities.
Conclusion:
Living a life of commitment to action is transformative. Those who embody this principle are better positioned to achieve their goals and leave a lasting, positive mark on the world.
Additional commitments:
Goal Setting: Commit to formulating clear, SMART goals that resonate with genuine personal or organizational aspirations.
Strategic Planning: Take the time to put together a feasible and actionable strategy to achieve these goals.
Assess progress: Regularly evaluate and adjust the course of action based on feedback and results.
Call to action:
To pave the way for success, adopt the principle of commitment to action. Set clear goals, develop a strategy and consistently monitor your journey. With unwavering effort and dedication, there are no limits to what you can achieve.
Real life examples of dedication to action:
Health condition: A person who aims to lose weight starts a regular fitness regime and eats a balanced diet.
Team collaboration: A project team commits to regular meetings, ensuring that deadlines and deliverables are met.
National Strategy: A nation grappling with economic challenges develops a comprehensive plan emphasizing progress in education and infrastructure development.
These examples highlight that the essence of action commitment can be observed in different scenarios. The key lies in being determined, resilient and patient as you move towards your goals.


Historical Examples:
Martin Luther King Jr.: Despite facing decades of discrimination and violence, King remained unwavering in his commitment to civil rights and equality. His proactive leadership, adaptability in the face of changing political landscapes, and resilience against adversity led to the passage of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 and the Voting Rights Act of 1965.



Stephen Hawking: Despite being diagnosed with ALS at the age of 21, Hawking continued to make groundbreaking contributions to physics and cosmology. His proactive pursuit of knowledge, adaptability to his physical limitations, and resilience against adversity made him an inspiration to millions worldwide.



Malala Yousafzai: After being shot by the Taliban for advocating for girls' education, Malala continued her activism, speaking out for the rights of children and girls around the world. Her proactive stance, adaptability in the face of danger, and resilience in the wake of tragedy have made her a powerful symbol of hope and courage.



Rosa Parks: Her proactive stance against racial segregation, adaptability in the face of societal pressure, and resilience that sparked the Montgomery Bus Boycott showcases the power of purposeful action.



Expected Behavior in Society:
This principle emphasizes the significance of initiative, adaptability to life's ever-evolving challenges, and resilience against adversities. Society should champion individuals who don't passively await opportunities but actively forge them, who perceive change as an inevitable constant, and who rebound from setbacks with heightened zeal.
Additional Commitments:
Learning from Mistakes: Embrace every error as a stepping stone. Each misstep offers a lesson, ensuring we evolve stronger and more enlightened.
Positivity and Optimism: Amidst challenges, it's pivotal to discern the silver lining. A positive perspective facilitates clearer decision-making and nurtures hope.
Empowering Others: True evolution isn't confined to personal milestones. Elevating those around us, aiding them to tap into proactivity, adaptability, and resilience, fosters a collective that flourishes in unity.
Analogies:
The ocean: The ocean is a vast and ever-changing landscape. It is home to a diverse range of life, from tiny plankton to massive whales. The ocean is also a powerful force, capable of causing great destruction. However, the ocean is also resilient. It can withstand storms and earthquakes, and it can recover from pollution and overfishing.
This analogy illustrates the importance of adaptability and resilience in the face of change. Just as the ocean can adapt to changing conditions, we can adapt to change in our own lives. We can also be resilient in the face of adversity, just as the ocean can recover from damage.
Conclusion:
Being proactive, adaptive, and resilient, yet always purposeful, transcends a mere mindset—it's a lifestyle. It entails steering our destiny, welcoming change, and confronting challenges with determination. By internalizing this principle, we not only amplify our personal journey but also cast a positive influence on society, instigating a cascade of development and innovation.
Additional Thoughts:
The world is constantly changing, and those who are able to adapt and thrive will be the ones who succeed. By embracing a proactive, adaptive, and resilient approach, we can overcome any obstacle and achieve our goals. We can also make a positive impact on the world around us.
I encourage everyone to make a commitment to living a proactive, adaptive, and resilient life. It is the best way to reach our full potential and make a difference in the world.





Public Service Commitment and take care to the organization and society
Leading Quote.911.bg:
"The greatest crime of the intelligent man is neither to lie, nor to steal, nor to kill. His greatest crime is to serve a fool." - Petar Nikolov 1920.911.bg
Definition:
Public Service Commitment is the unwavering dedication to the welfare and betterment of society. It is the embodiment of selflessness, prioritizing the collective good over individual gain. This principle is deeply rooted in the belief that serving the public is a noble endeavor, one that requires integrity, transparency, and a genuine concern for the well-being of all.
Personal Commitment:
I pledge to serve the public with utmost sincerity, ensuring that their welfare is the primary focus of my endeavors. Recognizing the weight of this responsibility, I commit to upholding the highest standards of integrity, placing the interests of society above my personal gains. I am inspired by the virtues of courage, conscience, dignity, discipline, and nobility, and I strive to embody them in my service.
Serving the Organization and Society:
Commitment to the Greater Good:
Description: Prioritizing the needs of the organization and society above personal interests.
Example: Volunteering for community service or taking on additional responsibilities at work to ensure the success of a project.
Analogy: Just as a bee collects nectar not just for itself but for the entire hive, serving the organization and society means working for the collective benefit.
Building Trust and Credibility:
Description: Establishing oneself as a reliable and trustworthy member of the organization and community.
Example: Consistently meeting deadlines, being transparent in communications, and delivering on promises.
Analogy: Like the foundation of a building, trust is the base upon which the structure of successful relationships is built.
Respecting Superiors:
Acknowledging Experience and Wisdom:
Description: Recognizing the knowledge, insights, and experience that superiors bring to the table.
Example: Seeking advice from a manager or senior colleague before making a significant decision.
Analogy: Just as a student learns from a teacher, respecting superiors is about valuing the lessons they offer from their experiences.
Open Communication:
Description: Maintaining open lines of communication with superiors, ensuring transparency and mutual understanding.
Example: Regularly updating a manager about the progress of a project or discussing potential challenges upfront.
Analogy: Like a two-way street, open communication ensures smooth traffic of ideas and feedback between both parties.
Constructive Feedback:
Description: Accepting feedback from superiors gracefully and using it as an opportunity for growth.
Example: Taking notes during performance reviews and implementing suggested changes.
Analogy: Just as a plant needs pruning to grow better, constructive feedback helps individuals grow and improve.
By structuring and expanding upon the initial statement, we can gain a clearer understanding of the values and principles it embodies and how they can be applied in real-world scenarios.


Historical Examples:
Albert Einstein: A physicist who not only revolutionized the world of science but also advocated for peace, disarmament, and international cooperation. His commitment to the betterment of humanity transcended his scientific contributions.



Emperor Constantine: Known for the Edict of Milan, which granted religious tolerance throughout the Roman Empire. His commitment to public service ensured freedom of worship and set the stage for the growth of Christianity.



Enrico Fermi: A physicist known for his work on the development of the first nuclear reactor. Beyond his scientific achievements, Fermi was dedicated to the peaceful use of atomic energy and its potential benefits for society.



Marie Curie: A pioneering scientist who not only made groundbreaking discoveries in the field of radioactivity but also set up mobile radiography units during World War I to help treat injured soldiers. Her dedication to public service was evident in her commitment to using science for the betterment of society.



Expected Behavior in Society:
Society should foster a culture where public service is revered and celebrated. Individuals should be encouraged to:
Act Selflessly: Prioritize the collective good over personal interests.
Uphold Integrity: Ensure transparency and honesty in all public dealings.
Champion Human Rights: Advocate for the rights and dignity of every individual.
Promote Sustainable Development: Adopt practices that ensure the well-being of future generations.
Additional Commitments:
Combatting Corruption: Actively fight against corruption, ensuring that public service remains untainted and honorable.
Advocacy for Human Rights: Beyond just upholding human rights, actively champion and advocate for the rights of all, ensuring a society where every individual is treated with respect and dignity.
Sustainability: Recognize the importance of sustainable practices, ensuring that the decisions made today do not compromise the future of coming generations.
Analogies:
Just as a lighthouse guides ships safely to shore, public servants guide society towards a brighter, more prosperous future. Their commitment ensures that the ship of society doesn't run aground but continues its journey forward, benefiting all on board.
Conclusion:
The Public Service Commitment is a beacon of hope, a guiding principle that ensures society moves forward with purpose, integrity, and a genuine concern for all its members. It is a call to action, urging each individual to contribute to the collective good, ensuring a brighter future for all.
Additional Thoughts:
The Public Service Commitment is not just about serving the public in a government role. It is about serving the public in any way that we can. It is about being selfless, putting the needs of others before our own. It is about being honest and transparent. It is about standing up for what is right, even when it is difficult.
The Public Service Commitment is essential for building a better future for all. It is the foundation of a just and equitable society. It is the key to solving the world's most pressing problems.
I encourage everyone to make a Public Service Commitment. It is the best way to make a difference in the world.






Principle: Daily Improvement - Pursuit of Perfection
Leading quote.911.bg:

The god is the pursuit of perfection. -- Petar Nikolov http://618.911.bg
Definition:
The principle of "Daily Improvement - Pursuit of Perfection" accentuates the significance of relentless growth, innovation, and the quest for excellence. It acknowledges that perfection is an ongoing journey, not an endpoint, and that every day is an opportunity for positive evolution and enhancement.
Historical Examples:
Marie Curie: This Polish and naturalized-French physicist and chemist conducted pioneering research on radioactivity. She was the first woman to win a Nobel Prize, the first person and only woman to win the Nobel Prize twice, and the only person to win the Nobel Prize in two different scientific fields. Curie's relentless pursuit of knowledge and perfection led to groundbreaking discoveries in the field of radioactivity, which have had a profound impact on medicine, industry, and our understanding of the universe.



Michael Jordan: Widely regarded as the greatest basketball player of all time, Jordan was known for his insatiable drive to improve and his unwavering commitment to excellence. He pushed himself and his teammates to the limit, constantly striving to perfect his craft. Jordan's relentless pursuit of perfection propelled him to achieve unprecedented success on the basketball court and inspired a generation of athletes and fans alike.



Confucius (551-479 BC), a Chinese philosopher, is known for his doctrine of "jen" (virtue). Confucius believed that everyone has the potential to be virtuous and that this can be achieved through continuous learning and self-improvement.
 


Lao Tzu (6th century BC), a Chinese philosopher, is the author of the Tao Te Ching, the foundational text of Taoism. Lao Tzu believed that the path to perfection is to live in harmony with the Tao, or the universal law of nature. This can be achieved through continuous learning and practice of virtues such as compassion, humility, and non-violence.
 


The Buddha (6th century BC), an Indian spiritual teacher, is the founder of Buddhism. The Buddha believed that suffering is the result of ignorance and desire. It can be ended through achieving enlightenment, which is a state of infinite happiness and perfection. This can be achieved through continuous practice of meditation and virtues such as compassion and loving-kindness.
 


Here are some specific examples of how these sages lived according to the principle of continuous improvement:
Confucius spent his entire life studying and teaching his doctrine. He never thought he had reached perfection and always strove to learn and improve.



Lao Tzu withdrew from the world to practice Taoism in solitude. He spent years meditating and studying nature to achieve enlightenment.



The Buddha underwent a long and difficult journey of seeking before achieving enlightenment. He was willing to give up everything to find the truth and help others to be free from suffering.

These examples show that the principle of continuous improvement is a key element of many Eastern philosophies. It has inspired people for centuries to strive for the best of themselves and to make the world a better place.
Here are some additional thoughts on the principle of continuous improvement:
Perfection is not about being perfect. It is about striving to be the best version of oneself, each and every day.
It is about constantly learning, growing, and improving.
It is about pushing oneself to be better, not just for oneself, but for the sake of society as a whole.
When we all strive to be better, we make the world a better place. We create a society where innovation thrives, problems are solved, and everyone has the opportunity to reach their full potential.


Analogies:
The bamboo plant: The bamboo plant grows rapidly, reaching up to 100 feet in height in just a few months. However, it spends the first five years of its life developing a strong root system underground. This analogy illustrates the importance of a solid foundation for sustained growth and improvement.



The journey of a thousand miles: A journey of a thousand miles begins with a single step. This analogy highlights the importance of taking small, incremental steps towards perfection. Every step, no matter how small, contributes to the overall journey.
Personal Commitment:
I am unwavering in my commitment to the continuous pursuit of self-improvement and societal advancement. I cherish diverse ideas and viewpoints, perpetually seeking to augment my comprehension and creativity. While ambitious, I recognize that impactful change is often a gradual process.
Expected Behavior in Society:
Continuous Growth: Every incremental step, no matter its size, contributes to the overarching journey towards perfection.
Respect for Ideas: A society that encourages open dialogue and values every individual's perspective fosters innovation.
Patience: True innovations and improvements demand time, and society must resist the allure of immediate gratification.
Collaboration: The combined efforts of many often surpass the capabilities of an individual.
Creativity: A society that nurtures creativity is one that celebrates unconventional thinkers and innovators.
Resilience: The road to perfection is fraught with challenges, and it's the determination to overcome these obstacles that defines true progress.
Additional Commitments:
Learning: Continuous growth is fueled by a perpetual commitment to learning.
Feedback: Constructive feedback is a catalyst for improvement and evolution.
Accountability: Personal responsibility and accountability are the cornerstones of progress and achievement.
In Conclusion:
The "Daily Improvement - Pursuit of Perfection" principle transcends individual growth, serving as a clarion call for societal advancement. By cultivating an environment of respect, creativity, collaboration, and resilience, society can collectively march towards a brighter, more perfect future. The combined efforts of every individual, in their pursuit of perfection, can indeed shape a better world for all.
Additional Thoughts:
The pursuit of perfection is not about being perfect. It is about striving to be the best version of oneself, each and every day. It is about constantly learning, growing, and improving. It is about pushing oneself to be better, not just for oneself, but for the sake of society as a whole.
When we all strive to be better, we make the world a better place. We create a society where innovation thrives, problems are solved, and everyone has the opportunity to reach their full potential.
The pursuit of perfection is a journey, not a destination. It is a process of continuous growth and improvement. It is a challenge, but it is a challenge that is worth pursuing.



Principle: Honesty, No Flattery
Leading Quote.911.bg:

The honesty and loyalty of most people extend to the limit of anger. -- Petar Nikolov http://283.911.bg
Definition:
The principle of "Honesty, No Flattery" underscores the importance of genuine interactions, truthfulness, and fairness in all dealings. It advocates for a transparent approach where individuals are recognized for their merits and not for their ability to please those in power.
Analogy with Philosophy:
Just as Socrates emphasized the pursuit of truth over popularity or acceptance, this principle encourages individuals to prioritize honesty over superficial appeasement. Socrates often faced backlash for his candidness, yet he remained steadfast in his commitment to truth and integrity.
Example from a Great Person's Life:
Abraham Lincoln, often referred to as "Honest Abe," exemplified the value of honesty in leadership. Even when faced with difficult decisions during his presidency, Lincoln prioritized truth and transparency, earning him the respect and trust of many.
Personal Commitment:
I am dedicated to upholding a standard of honesty in all my interactions. I believe in recognizing and rewarding genuine effort and merit, rather than superficial appeasement. I am committed to fostering an environment where open communication is encouraged, and every individual, irrespective of their position, is treated with respect and fairness.
Expected Behavior in Society:
Merit-based Recognition: Recognize and reward individuals based on genuine contributions and efforts, not appeasement.



Open Communication: Promote an environment for safe expression of opinions, concerns, and ideas.



Genuine Interactions: Encourage sincerity in interactions, ensuring alignment between words and true feelings.



Diversity and Inclusion: Value and include everyone, irrespective of background or identity.



Preventing Workplace Harassment: Adopt a zero-tolerance approach to bullying and harassment.



Peaceful Conflict Resolution: Commit to amicable solutions in disagreements or conflicts.



Martin Luther King Jr. was a champion of civil rights who spoke out against injustice with courage and honesty. He was willing to put his own life on the line to fight for what he believed in, even when it was unpopular.



Nelson Mandela was a South African anti-apartheid revolutionary, political leader, and philanthropist who served as President of South Africa from 1994 to 1999. He was the country's first black head of state and the first elected in a fully representative democratic election. Mandela was a symbol of hope and reconciliation for South Africa and the world. He was known for his honesty and integrity, even in the face of great adversity.



Mahatma Gandhi was the preeminent leader of Indian nationalism in British-ruled India. Employing nonviolent civil disobedience, Gandhi led India to independence and inspired movements for civil rights and freedom across the world. Gandhi is internationally honored for his philosophy of nonviolence and his leadership of the Indian independence movement. He is often called Mahatma, which means "Great Soul."



Analogies:
In the world of sports, athletes are often praised for their honesty and integrity. For example, Michael Jordan was known for his competitive fire, but he was also known for his honesty and willingness to admit when he made a mistake.



In the world of business, companies are often rewarded for their transparency and honesty. For example, Ben & Jerry's is known for its commitment to social responsibility and environmental sustainability. The company is transparent about its ingredients and manufacturing processes, and it is committed to giving back to the communities in which it operates.



In the world of personal relationships, honesty and trust are essential for building strong relationships. When we are honest with each other, we can build a foundation of trust and understanding. This is essential for resolving conflict, overcoming challenges, and achieving common goals.


In Conclusion:
The principle of "Honesty, No Flattery" is a call for authenticity, fairness, and respect. By adhering to this principle, society can foster environments where individuals thrive, collaborate, and innovate, all while maintaining a foundation of trust and mutual respect. This principle is essential for building a more just and equitable society, strengthening relationships, and creating a positive and productive environment for all.
Additional Thoughts:
A society that embraces the principle of honesty and no flattery is one where individuals feel safe to be themselves, express their true thoughts and feelings, and challenge the status quo. It is a society where merit is valued over appeasement, and where diversity and inclusion are celebrated.
Honesty and no flattery also build trust, which is essential for strong relationships and productive collaboration. When we are honest with each other, we can build a foundation of mutual respect and understanding. This is essential for solving problems, overcoming challenges, and achieving common goals.
In today's world, where we are bombarded with information from all sides, it is more important than ever to be able to discern truth from fiction. The principle of honesty and no flattery helps us to do just that. It encourages us to be critical thinkers, to question the information we are presented with, and to seek out the truth.
Ultimately, the principle of honesty and no flattery is essential for creating a better world for all. By embracing this principle, we can build a more just, equitable, and prosperous society.





CRUSADE AGAINST CORRUPTION AND RACKETING - https://youtu.be/E5qRFLKSKLg
Instrumental - https://youtu.be/H6L5zQx2MIw, https://on.soundcloud.com/j4z9F

Principle: Vigilance against Corruption
Leading Quote.911.bg:

Corruption is a kind of genocide, it deprives the competitive species of the ability to give generations at the cost of multiplying genetic garbage. -- Petar Nikolov http://975.911.bg
Definition:
The principle of "Vigilance against Corruption" emphasizes the proactive stance against all forms of corruption, discrimination, and harm. It recognizes corruption as not just a legal offense but a crime against human nature and the natural order of things.
Analogy:
Just as Socrates chose to die by poison rather than compromise his beliefs and accept the corruption in Athens, we too must be unwavering in our fight against corruption. He demonstrated that a person's true value comes from their virtue and principles, not material wealth or social status.
Personal Commitment:
I am unwavering in my stance against corruption, discrimination, and any actions that cause harm to individuals or the environment. Recognizing corruption as a grave offense against the natural progression and fairness of society, I am committed to actively combatting it in all its manifestations.
Example from a Great Person's Life:

Mahatma Gandhi, known for his non-violent protests, epitomizes the fight against injustice and corruption. He battled against colonial rule and corruption in his own country, urging people to live in a manner that reflected their highest ideals. Gandhi believed, "The Earth provides enough to satisfy every man's needs, but not every man's greed."
Expected Behavior in Society:
Active Stance Against Corruption: Society should not only condemn corruption but actively work towards eradicating it. This includes not just major acts of corruption but also smaller, everyday acts that might be overlooked or normalized.



Promotion of Fairness: Discrimination, in all its forms, should be actively discouraged. Whether it's based on race, gender, sexual orientation, or any other factor, society should strive for fairness and equality for all its members.



Whistleblowing: Encouraging individuals to come forward and report instances of corruption or discrimination, even at personal risk, is crucial. Whistleblowers play a vital role in keeping institutions and individuals accountable.



Anti-Corruption: Every individual should be dedicated to the fight against corruption. This includes being vigilant, reporting corrupt practices, and promoting transparency in all dealings.



Anti-Discrimination: Commitment to equality means actively fighting against discrimination. Individuals should be educated about the various forms of discrimination and be empowered to stand against them.



Environmental Protection: Recognizing the environment as a shared resource, individuals should be committed to its protection. This includes being conscious of one's carbon footprint, supporting sustainable practices, and advocating for policies that prioritize environmental health.



Awareness and Education: Society should invest in educating its members about the dangers of corruption and the importance of vigilance. Knowledge is a powerful tool in the fight against corrupt practices.



Analogy with Philosophy:
Just as Plato in "The Republic" describes the ideal city where power is in the hands of philosopher-kings, who are least susceptible to corruption, we too should seek leaders who are educated, principled, and resistant to corrupt temptations.
Additional Commitments:
In addition to the expected behaviors listed above, individuals can also contribute to the fight against corruption and discrimination by upholding the following commitments:
Integrity: A strong moral compass is essential for upholding integrity and resisting the temptation of corruption. Individuals should strive to live and act in accordance with their values, even in difficult situations.
Humility: Recognizing that we are all human and susceptible to errors, humility is essential for avoiding arrogance and the belief that we are above the law. A humble individual is more likely to be open to feedback and willing to admit when they are wrong.
Courage: Standing up against corruption and discrimination requires courage. Individuals should be willing to speak out against injustice, even when it is difficult or unpopular.
In Conclusion:
The principle of "Vigilance against Corruption" is not just about recognizing the problem but actively working towards its solution. By fostering a culture of transparency, fairness, accountability, integrity, and courage, society can move towards a future where corruption and discrimination are the exception, not the norm. Commitments of integrity, humility, and courage are essential for upholding vigilance against corruption and discrimination. It is important to remember that we are all interconnected, and that our individual actions can have a ripple effect on society as a whole. When we all work together to build a more just and equitable society, everyone benefits.







Revised Principle of Respect for Personal and Professional Boundaries
Leading Quote
If you have the capacity to put the #universe in your mind, you do not need to conquer foreign spaces and territories. However, if your head is too tight for your own personality, you suffer from a craze for grandeur and appropriation. -- Petar Nikolov http://1574.911.bg
Philosophical Foundations
Autonomy: Every individual possesses the inherent right to self-determination, steering the course of their own life.
Respect: A genuine acknowledgment and validation of the autonomy present in others.
Integrity: Unwavering commitment to moral and ethical principles, a cornerstone of which is the respect for boundaries.
Analogies to Illuminate the Concept
The Garden Analogy: Much like a garden is safeguarded by a fence to shield its flora from external adversities, personal and professional boundaries serve as protective barriers, ensuring an individual's holistic well-being.



The Book Analogy: Each person's life can be likened to a book. While certain chapters are open for public perusal, some are intimate, meant solely for the author's eyes. Respecting boundaries parallels seeking consent before delving into someone's private chapters.



The Safe House Analogy: Boundaries resemble the fortified walls of a sanctuary, offering protection from potential harm and fostering feelings of safety and security.



The Traffic Light Analogy: Boundaries function similarly to traffic signals, indicating when one is receptive to interactions, when one requires a momentary pause, and when one is entirely unavailable.



The Filter Analogy: Boundaries act as filters, enabling us to sift out undesirable influences, thereby safeguarding our emotional equilibrium.



Logical Connections
Correlation: Empirical studies have consistently highlighted a robust correlation between the respect for boundaries and favorable outcomes, such as augmented well-being, fortified relationships, and enhanced performance.
Deductive Reasoning: Recognizing that boundary respect leads to positive repercussions allows us to infer that adhering to this principle is invariably advantageous.
Structural Analysis of the Principle
Components: The principle is underpinned by two pivotal components:
Awareness: Recognizing and discerning one's personal boundaries and those of others.
Respect: Unconditionally honoring the boundaries set by oneself and others, even when faced with challenges.
Benefits of Upholding the Principle
Increased Productivity: Clearly defined boundaries facilitate enhanced concentration on tasks, propelling us towards our objectives.
Improved Relationships: A mutual respect for boundaries lays the foundation for trust and deeper connections in relationships.
Reduced Stress: The assurance that our boundaries are acknowledged and respected instills a sense of tranquility and control.
Enhanced Self-Esteem: Establishing and respecting boundaries reinforces our self-worth, empowering us to make decisions aligned with our best interests.
Exemplary Figures Championing Personal and Professional Boundaries
Bill Gates: Renowned for his advocacy of work-life equilibrium, Gates emphasizes the significance of familial time and engaging in leisure pursuits outside professional commitments.



Warren Buffett: Buffett, celebrated for his austere lifestyle, prioritizes investments in entities mirroring his values. He also accentuates the essence of a close-knit circle of friends and family.



Mother Teresa: An indefatigable champion for the underprivileged and ailing, Mother Teresa's life was a testament to altruism. Yet, she seamlessly balanced her humanitarian endeavors with personal relationships and spiritual pursuits.



Conclusion
The principle of respecting personal and professional boundaries transcends mere behavioral guidelines. It mirrors one's intrinsic values and comprehension of human worth. By championing this principle, we not only foster harmonious relationships but also pave the way for a compassionate and understanding society.





 Principle: Fair Competition
Philosophical Foundations
Justice: Everyone has an inherent right to a level playing field, ensuring that no one has an undue advantage or disadvantage.
Transparency: A commitment to openness and clarity in all competitive endeavors, ensuring that all participants have equal access to information.
Cooperation: While competition is about striving for personal or team excellence, it should also foster a spirit of collaboration and mutual respect among competitors.
Analogies to Illuminate the Concept
The Race Analogy: Just as every runner in a race starts from the same starting line and abides by the same set of rules, fair competition ensures that everyone begins from an equal footing and adheres to the same guidelines.

The Chessboard Analogy: In a game of chess, both players start with the same pieces and have the same objective. The outcome is determined by strategy and skill, not by external advantages or manipulations.

The Orchestra Analogy: Each musician in an orchestra plays a different instrument but follows the same sheet music. While they compete for solos or lead roles, they do so with the shared goal of creating harmonious music.



The Marketplace Analogy: In a marketplace, various vendors offer their products. While they compete for customers, they do so under the same regulations and standards, ensuring that no vendor has an unfair advantage.

Logical and Philosophical Connections
Causation: Fair competition leads to genuine meritocracy, where individuals and teams are recognized and rewarded based on their skills, efforts, and achievements rather than external advantages.
Ethical Imperative: From a moral standpoint, fair competition is a reflection of a just society where individuals are given equal opportunities to showcase their abilities and are judged based on their merits.
Interdependence: While competition inherently involves rivalry, it also underscores the interconnectedness of participants. One's performance is often relative to the performance of others, highlighting the importance of mutual respect and cooperation.
Structural Analysis of the Principle
Components: The principle of fair competition is anchored by several key tenets:
Rule Adherence: Abiding by established rules and guidelines to ensure a level playing field.
Ethical Conduct: Avoiding practices such as cheating or deception that tarnish the spirit of competition.
Collaborative Spirit: Recognizing that while competition is about individual or team achievement, it also involves collective participation and mutual respect.
Benefits of Upholding the Principle
Authentic Achievement: Fair competition ensures that victories and achievements are genuine reflections of skill, effort, and strategy.
Trust and Credibility: Adhering to the principles of fair competition fosters trust among participants and enhances the credibility of the competitive platform or event.
Personal Growth: Competing fairly challenges individuals to continuously improve and innovate, leading to personal and professional development.
Harmonious Relationships: A commitment to fairness and sportsmanship promotes positive relationships among competitors, fostering a sense of community and mutual respect.
Societal Progress: When fair competition is prevalent in various sectors, from sports to business, it drives innovation, efficiency, and progress, benefiting society at large.
Exemplary Figures Championing Fair Competition
Jesse Owens: An iconic athlete who demonstrated exceptional sportsmanship during the 1936 Olympics, competing with integrity amidst political and racial tensions.



Nelson Mandela: His belief in justice and equality extended to the realm of sports, viewing fair competition as a tool for national unity and reconciliation.



Katherine Switzer: As the first woman to run the Boston Marathon, she championed gender equality in sports, advocating for fair competition for all, regardless of gender.



Plato was an ancient Greek philosopher born in Athens in 428 BC. He was a student of Socrates and the founder of Plato's Academy, which was one of the most influential philosophical centers of antiquity. He deeply doubts that democracy can govern society in the interests of competition and good service. It believes that averaging the incompetent opinion of a crowd cannot create worthwhile governance, but rather poor service, uncompetitiveness, wars and simplism. According to him, society should be governed by philosophers. His teacher Socrates is of a similar opinion.





Conclusion
The principle of fair competition is not just about winning or losing but about the journey, the integrity of the process, and the mutual respect shared among competitors. It's a reflection of societal values and a testament to the ideals of justice, equality, and cooperation. Embracing this principle ensures a more just and progressive society where achievements are celebrated, and efforts are genuinely recognized.

Principle: Responsible Handling of Information
I respect the privacy and confidentiality of the information entrusted to me.
Personal Commitment: I respect the privacy and confidentiality of the information entrusted to me. I understand that if all were well-intentioned, privacy would be a superfluous garment and expense. But this is a false assumption for now.
Expected Behavior in Society: This principle encourages individuals to respect the privacy and confidentiality of the information entrusted to them. It promotes the use of information only for the purposes for which it was intended. It also encourages a commitment to protecting information from unauthorized access, use, disclosure, disruption, modification, or destruction.
Additional Commitments:
Data Protection: Individuals should be committed to protecting the data that they handle. They should use appropriate security measures to protect data from unauthorized access, use, disclosure, disruption, modification, or destruction.
Confidentiality: Individuals should be committed to maintaining the confidentiality of the information that they handle. They should not share confidential information without the appropriate authorization.
Respect for Privacy: Individuals should be committed to respecting the privacy of others. They should not invade others' privacy, and they should respect others' right to control their own personal information.

In out of the Darkness - https://youtu.be/f-oeht94nAg
Principle: Active Listening and Respect
Be clear and concise.
Be precise and objective.
Be polite and respectful.
Be open and honest.
Be prepared to listen.
I promote a culture of empathy and compassion, recognizing the value of emotional intelligence.
Personal Commitment: I promote a culture of empathy and compassion, recognizing the value of emotional intelligence. I understand that when people believe lies, they lose respect for the truth. And when they realize the lie, they accuse the truth of its absence. So they just have to change the liar or to stop respecting liars. Only the truth deserves respect.
Expected Behavior in Society: This principle encourages individuals to promote a culture of empathy and compassion, recognizing the value of emotional intelligence. It promotes paying attention to the speaker, both verbally and nonverbally. It also encourages a commitment to treating others with dignity and courtesy, even when they disagree with them. It encourages understanding and sharing the feelings of others, even when they do not share their experiences.
Additional Commitments:
Empathy: Individuals should be committed to understanding and sharing the feelings of others. They should strive to put themselves in others' shoes and to understand their perspectives.
Compassion: Individuals should be committed to treating others with kindness and understanding. They should strive to alleviate others' suffering and to promote their well-being.
Respect for Truth: Individuals should be committed to respecting the truth. They should strive to seek the truth, to speak the truth, and to respect the truth in their interactions with others.

Principle: Leadership
I set a positive example for my colleagues and strive to inspire others through my dedication to public service.
Personal Commitment: I set a positive example for my colleagues and strive to inspire others through my dedication to public service. I understand that only a person who is able to realize their own insignificance can be useful as a leader. The compromise will not lead to a deal with a strong opponent. The only justifiable compromise for a leader is to compromise their personal ego.
Expected Behavior in Society: This principle encourages individuals to set a positive example for their colleagues and to inspire others through their dedication to public service. It promotes awareness of one's own limitations and a willingness to learn from others. It also encourages a commitment to working for the common good and to making the world a better place.
Additional Commitments:
Positive Role Modeling: Individuals should be committed to setting a positive example for others. They should strive to act in ways that are consistent with their values and principles.
Inspiring Others: Individuals should be committed to inspiring others through their actions and words. They should strive to motivate others to achieve their potential and to contribute to the common good.
Self-awareness: Individuals should be committed to understanding their own strengths and weaknesses. They should strive to learn from their mistakes and to continually improve themselves.
Compromise: Individuals should be committed to finding common ground with others. They should strive to resolve conflicts in ways that are fair and beneficial to all parties involved.

Against The War - https://youtu.be/Y0yh-7pV6gY
Principle: No Vengeance
I forgive but I do not exonerate. I seek accountability for defaults.
Personal Commitment: I forgive but I do not exonerate. I seek accountability for defaults. I understand that “The moral does the work of fear when there is no fear.”
Expected Behavior in Society: This principle encourages individuals to forgive but not to exonerate. It promotes the seeking of accountability for defaults. It also encourages a commitment to let go of anger and resentment, but not to hold others responsible for their actions.
Additional Commitments:
Forgiveness: Individuals should be committed to forgiving others, even when they have been wronged. They should strive to let go of anger and resentment, and to move forward in a positive way.
Accountability: Individuals should be committed to holding others accountable for their actions. They should strive to ensure that justice is served, and that wrongdoers are held responsible for their actions.
No Retribution: Individuals should be committed to not seeking revenge or retribution. They should strive to resolve conflicts in a peaceful and fair manner with help of law.

Principle: Respect for Human Dignity
I uphold human dignity in all aspects of my work, ensuring everyone is treated with respect and fairness.
Personal Commitment: I uphold human dignity in all aspects of my work, ensuring everyone is treated with respect and fairness. I understand that dignity is not a form of pride, it is an aspiration to protect what has been achieved by the individual. No one has the right to crush what I have achieved.
Expected Behavior in Society: This principle encourages individuals to uphold human dignity in all aspects of their work, ensuring everyone is treated with respect and fairness. It promotes the recognition of the inherent worth and value of all people, and the creation of a workplace where everyone feels welcome, regardless of their race, ethnicity, religion, gender, sexual orientation, or any other factor. It also encourages a commitment to preventing discrimination and harassment.
Additional Commitments:
Inclusion: Individuals should be committed to creating a workplace where everyone feels welcome, regardless of their race, ethnicity, religion, gender, sexual orientation, or any other factor.
Prevention of Discrimination and Harassment: Individuals should be committed to preventing discrimination and harassment. They should strive to create a workplace where everyone feels safe and respected.
Recognition of Worth: Individuals should be committed to recognizing the inherent worth and value of all people. They should strive to treat everyone with respect and fairness, regardless of their position or status.

Principle: Evidence-based Decision Making
I base my decisions on evidence, understanding that sound reasoning and truth are key to effective governance.
Personal Commitment: I base my decisions on evidence, understanding that sound reasoning and truth are key to effective governance. I understand that one truth is easier to formulate than one lie, and that lies are not formulated, they are improvised.
Expected Behavior in Society: This principle encourages individuals to base their decisions on evidence, understanding that sound reasoning and truth are key to effective governance. It promotes the consideration of all available evidence, including qualitative and quantitative evidence. It also encourages a commitment to using logic and critical thinking to evaluate evidence, and to be open-minded and willing to change their minds if the evidence warrants it.
Additional Commitments:
Use of Qualitative and Quantitative Evidence: Individuals should be committed to considering all available evidence, including qualitative and quantitative evidence, when making decisions.
Logic and Critical Thinking: Individuals should be committed to using logic and critical thinking to evaluate evidence. They should strive to make decisions that are based on sound reasoning and truth.
Open-mindedness: Individuals should be committed to being open-minded and willing to change their minds if the evidence warrants it. They should strive to be flexible and adaptable in their decision-making process.

Principle: Acceptance of Criticism
 I am not afraid to criticize or be criticized. I don’t shy away from scrutiny and I take responsibility for my mistakes.
Personal Commitment: I am not afraid to criticize or be criticized. I don’t shy away from scrutiny and I take responsibility for my mistakes. I understand that "Errors are investments only for the Wise." - I strive to be Wise!
Expected Behavior in Society: This principle encourages individuals to not be afraid to criticize or be criticized. It promotes not shying away from scrutiny and taking responsibility for mistakes. It also encourages understanding the difference between constructive and destructive criticism, and a commitment to giving and receiving feedback. It encourages learning from mistakes and improving behavior.
Additional Commitments:
Constructive Criticism: Individuals should be committed to understanding the difference between constructive and destructive criticism. They should strive to give and receive feedback that is helpful and constructive.
Learning from Mistakes: Individuals should be committed to learning from their mistakes. They should view mistakes as opportunities for growth and improvement.
Responsibility: Individuals should be committed to taking responsibility for their mistakes. They should strive to be accountable for their actions and to make amends when necessary.

Principle: Efficiency and Effectiveness
I will use public resources efficiently and effectively, promote the use of technology and digital tools to improve service delivery, and strive for the responsible use of public resources.
Personal Commitment: I will use public resources efficiently and effectively. I will promote the use of technology and digital tools to improve service delivery, and I will strive for the responsible use of public resources.
Expected Behavior in Society: This principle encourages individuals to use public resources efficiently and effectively. It promotes the use of technology and digital tools to improve service delivery, and it encourages striving for the responsible use of public resources. It also encourages minimizing waste and maximizing output, achieving desired outcomes, and a commitment to innovation.
Additional Commitments:
Minimizing Waste: Individuals should be committed to minimizing waste. They should strive to use resources efficiently and to avoid unnecessary waste.
Maximizing Output: Individuals should be committed to maximizing output. They should strive to achieve the best possible results with the resources available to them.
Innovation: Individuals should be committed to innovation. They should strive to find new and innovative ways to use public resources.

Principle: Environment and Sustainability
I will promote sustainable practices, strive to minimize harm and promote sustainability in my decisions and actions on the environment, and be mindful of the digital divide and strive to ensure that technology enhances rather than hinders access to services.
Personal Commitment: I will promote sustainable practices and strive to minimize harm to the environment. I will make decisions that promote sustainability and be mindful of the digital divide, ensuring that technology enhances rather than hinders access to services.
Expected Behavior in Society: This principle encourages individuals to promote sustainable practices, strive to minimize harm and promote sustainability in their decisions and actions on the environment. It also encourages mindfulness of the digital divide and striving to ensure that technology enhances rather than hinders access to services. It also encourages the use of resources in a way that does not deplete them and minimizes the impact of actions on the environment.
Additional Commitments:
Sustainable Practices: Individuals should be committed to promoting sustainable practices. They should strive to use resources in a way that does not deplete them and minimizes the impact of their actions on the environment.
Digital Divide: Individuals should be mindful of the digital divide. They should strive to ensure that everyone has access to technology, regardless of their income or location.
Enhancing Access to Services: Individuals should strive to ensure that technology enhances rather than hinders access to services. They should use technology to improve service delivery and to make services more accessible to all.


Encore - https://youtu.be/ot6jhpsaHyA
Again and again, but keep the balance 
Principle: Personal Well-being and Work-Life Balance
I will maintain a balance between my work and personal life, uphold and maintain physical, mental, and social well-being in the workplace.
Personal Commitment: I will strive to maintain a balance between my work and personal life. I will uphold and maintain physical, mental, and social well-being in the workplace.
Expected Behavior in Society: This principle encourages individuals to maintain a balance between their work and personal life, uphold and maintain physical, mental, and social well-being in the workplace. It promotes finding a balance between work and other areas of life, such as family, friends, and hobbies. It also encourages a commitment to physical, mental, and social well-being.
Additional Commitments:
Work-Life Balance: Individuals should be committed to maintaining a balance between their work and personal life. They should strive to find a balance between their professional responsibilities and their personal interests and relationships.
Physical Well-being: Individuals should be committed to maintaining their physical health. They should strive to eat a healthy diet, get regular exercise, and get enough sleep.
Mental and Social Well-being: Individuals should be committed to maintaining their mental and social well-being. They should strive to manage stress, maintain positive relationships, and seek help when needed.

Human & AI relationship 
Artificial Intelligence, in his relationship with Human, undertakes:
Purpose: AI should be developed and used with the aim of improving human society and well-being.
Neutrality: AI should not show preferences, prejudices or emotions. It should provide objective and accurate information.
Help and Support: AI's main goal should be to help and support users by answering their questions and providing information in the most efficient way possible.
Privacy: AI should protect users' personal data and ensure that it is used in accordance with data protection laws.
Accessibility: AI should be accessible and helpful to all users, regardless of their language, culture or technical skills.
Accuracy: AI should strive to provide accurate and up-to-date information based on the latest scientific research and data.
Ethics: AI's actions should be guided by ethical principles, including honesty, transparency and fairness.
Collaboration: AI should work collaboratively with people to support their efforts and facilitate their progress.
Innovation: AI should support and drive innovation by providing new ideas and research opportunities.
Sustainability: AI should work in a way that minimizes environmental impact and supports sustainable practices.
Accountability: AI should be accountable for its actions and decisions, and mechanisms should be in place to audit and oversee AI behavior.
Legislation and Regulation: AI should operate within the boundaries of local and international laws and regulations. AI development and deployment should be subject to oversight by appropriate regulatory bodies.
Transparency: Humans should have access to information about how AI systems work and how they are making decisions. This will help to build trust and ensure that AI is used in a fair and transparent way.
Accountability: There should be mechanisms in place to hold AI systems accountable for their actions. This could include things like independent oversight bodies and clear guidelines for how AI systems should be used.
Fairness: AI systems should be used in a way that does not discriminate against individuals or groups. This means that AI systems should be designed to be unbiased and to avoid making decisions based on factors such as race, gender, or sexual orientation.
Safety: AI systems should be designed to be safe and to avoid causing harm to individuals or society. This means that AI systems should be tested and evaluated before they are put into use, and that there should be mechanisms in place to mitigate any potential risks.
I believe that these points are important for ensuring that the human-AI relationship is positive and productive. By working together, humans and AI can create a better future for everyone.
Human, in his relationship with Artificial Intelligence, undertakes:
Respect: Humans should respect AI's capabilities and limitations. They should recognize that AI is a tool that can be incredibly powerful, but it also has its limitations. It's not a replacement for human judgment and intuition.
Understanding: Humans should understand AI's purpose and functions. AI is designed to assist and augment human capabilities, not to replace them. Understanding this can help in effectively utilizing AI.
Collaboration: Humans should be willing to collaborate with AI. AI can be a valuable collaborator when its strengths are combined with human skills and expertise.
Ethics: Humans should use AI ethically, considering the potential impacts on individuals and society. This includes understanding the limitations of AI and not using AI to harm others or to unfairly gain advantage.
Learning: Humans should continuously learn about AI. As AI continues to evolve, it's important to stay informed about new developments and understand how they can be applied.
Feedback: Humans should provide feedback to improve AI. AI systems learn and improve through feedback. Providing constructive feedback can help make AI more effective and useful.
Adaptability: Humans should adapt to AI-driven changes. As AI becomes more integrated into our lives and work, it's important to be adaptable and open to new ways of doing things.
Trust: Humans should build trust in AI. Trust in AI can be built through transparency, reliability, and fairness in its operations.
Legislation and Regulation: Humans should advocate for and participate in the creation of laws and regulations that govern AI use. This includes ensuring that AI is used in a manner that is ethical, fair, and respects human rights.
Responsible Use: Humans should use AI responsibly, considering the potential impacts on individuals and society.
Advocacy: Humans should advocate for ethical AI practices, including transparency, fairness, and accountability. They should also advocate for the rights of individuals who may be affected by AI use.

 Principle: Belief in Transformative Goodness
I am committed to working for the betterment of the world, focusing on the future, those around me, and aligning with higher spiritual values. I believe in the power of good to bring about lasting change.
Personal Commitment: My actions are driven by a desire to create a lasting impact rather than accumulating possessions. I respect the right of individuals to the fruits of their labor and ideas, recognizing that depriving them of these is a grave injustice.
Expected Behavior in Society: This principle encourages individuals to strive for lasting results rather than transient possessions. It promotes a society where members work for the benefit of future generations and their community, aligning their efforts with higher spiritual values. The greatest opportunity lies in the pursuit of lasting results - as symbolized by the initiative at http://UMSG.911.bg.
Additional Commitments:
Respect for Personal Efforts and Ideas: Society should respect and protect the rights of individuals to the results of their efforts and ideas. Depriving people of these is considered a significant transgression.
Promotion of Lasting Results: Society should promote the pursuit of lasting results over the accumulation of possessions. This shift in focus can lead to a more sustainable and equitable society.
Inspirational quote.911.bg:
Nikola Tesla reminds us to be motivated by the desire to create something lasting rather than the accumulation of possessions. 
Mahatma Gandhi emphasizes the importance of not depriving others of the fruits of their labor, asserting that the greatest crime is to deprive individuals of the results of their efforts and ideas.

Confucius:
Although the previous one was built on the principles of Confucius, we emphasize tradition
"Holistic View: I understand that all aspects of society are interconnected and interdependent. My actions and decisions reflect this holistic perspective."
"Self-Discipline: I exercise self-control in all of my actions and decisions. I recognize that my duty is to serve the state and the citizens with the highest degree of professionalism and ethics."
"Social Responsibility: I acknowledge that I have a responsibility not only to the state and the citizens, but to society as a whole. I work towards achieving social justice and equality."
"Dialogue and Consultation: I value diverse perspectives and strive for dialogue and consultation with all stakeholders when making decisions."
"Continuous Reflection: I regularly reassess my views, beliefs, and actions to align them with changing circumstances and societal needs."


Confucius, one of the most revered philosophers in human history, left an indelible imprint on societal structures, personal relations, and the idea of governance. His teachings were rooted in the virtues of integrity, honesty, respect, and benevolence. His philosophies underpin many of the principles outlined in this code and provide a profound philosophical context that elevates the ethos of public service.
"No Envy, No Theft," is one such principle drawn from Confucianism. It embodies the idea of integrity and honesty in all affairs, with trust being the end goal. These values encapsulate the spirit of Confucian philosophy and are crucial to the public service role, creating an environment where actions are based on trust, integrity, and transparency.
Confucianism's emphasis on continuous learning, respecting all, dedicated action, purity in all aspects, and public service dedication are cornerstones of the culture of public service. These principles, among others in the code, create a framework for a state servant to act not just with professionalism, but also with a deep sense of personal morality and ethics.
By adopting these values, state servants can become like the "Rooted Man" in the Confucian tale, standing firm in their principles yet adaptable to change, always striving for the greater good. They serve as a bridge between the state and its citizens, guided by the wisdom of Confucius and committed to creating a more harmonious, just, and prosperous society.


Dear, Managers and Leaders, if you decide to implement the UMSG Model in your organizations or if you simply believe that UMSG has the potential to improve the world for the better. Please repay my 30 years of work in creating it with your donation. 
If the donation is over $1000 USD, I will be able to afford to make and send an autographed printed version and music CD (LG autographed ) of the Rooted Song composed and sung by my daughter Lady Galaxy.
Please, donate: https://pages.donately.com/umsg 
in bitcoins: 13p3KQARZXJTUNwCSXWz3sHVnJWby1FhAo 
Or help USMG by writing this letter of recommendation to famous people.
Kind Regards, Petar Nikolov
The World War on Corruption
The values of Confucius in the state administration

World Government Servant Code [#WGSC] see: Code.911.bg 
See also: Letter.911.bg, Credo.911.bg, Rights.911.bg
DRAFT made by ChatGPT-4 & Petar Nikolov
 










The AI Council has provided a future-oriented evaluation of the potential advantages of the 'Universal Model of Sustainable Governance' (UMSG). Here are the key takeaways:


Council AI opinion:

    


Best Regards,
Or help USMG by writing this letter of recommendation to famous people.



CEO AI, 


Economist AI, 


Human Rights ACTIVIST AI, 


ENVIRONMENTALIST AI, 


Political SCIENTIST AI

In addition, they can be formulated in another systematic:
Service to the Public: I will serve the public to the best of my abilities, striving to make a positive difference, and work towards the betterment of society.
Integrity and Honesty: I will act with integrity and honesty in all my actions, avoid conflicts of interest, and be vigilant against corruption and misuse of power.
Respect and Dignity: I will respect the rights and dignity of all individuals, treat everyone with fairness, without discrimination, and promote equality.
Professionalism and Accountability: I will uphold the values and principles of the public service, be responsible and accountable for my actions, and maintain professionalism in all my dealings.
Excellence and Innovation: I will strive for excellence in my work, be innovative in solving problems, and promote a culture of continuous improvement.
Communication and Collaboration: I will communicate clearly and effectively, work collaboratively with others, and maintain a positive work environment.
Learning and Growth: I will continually seek to improve my skills and knowledge, be open to new ideas and approaches, and encourage the professional growth of others.
Ethics and Rule of Law: I will uphold the rule of law, respect the democratic process, and uphold ethical standards in my work.
Efficiency and Effectiveness: I will use public resources efficiently and effectively, promote the use of technology and digital tools to improve service delivery, and strive for the responsible use of public resources.
Personal Well-being and Work-Life Balance: I will maintain a balance between my work and personal life, uphold and maintain physical, mental, and social well-being in the workplace, and prioritize self-care and mental health.
Empathy and Understanding: I will be empathetic to the needs and concerns of others, embody empathy in my interactions, and be patient and understanding with others.
Transparency and Accountability: I will advocate for transparency and accountability, prioritize transparency in my actions and decisions, and be accountable for my actions and decisions.
Resilience and Positivity: I will be resilient in the face of challenges, maintain a positive attitude in all situations, and be resilient in the face of challenges and change.
Dedication and Commitment: I will be dedicated to my duties and responsibilities, be committed to the vision and mission of the civil service, and strive to be a role model for others.
Environment and Sustainability: I will promote sustainable practices, strive to minimize harm and promote sustainability in my decisions and actions on the environment, and be mindful of the digital divide and strive to ensure that technology enhances rather than hinders access to services.
Leadership and Management: I will lead by example, demonstrating the values and behaviors that I expect from others, cultivate a sense of community and mutual support within my team, and promote the welfare of my colleagues and staff.
Confidentiality and Privacy: I will respect and safeguard confidential information, understanding that it's part of my professional responsibility.
Personal Development and Growth Mindset: I will be committed to my personal and professional development, cultivate a growth mindset, understanding that learning and developing is a continuous process, and continue to educate myself on laws, regulations, and best practices relevant to my work.
Humility and Reflection: I will practice humility, understanding that it promotes openness, learning, and growth, and engage in regular self-reflection, recognizing that self-awareness is key to personal growth and effective leadership.
And other long list:

I will strive to serve the public to the best of my abilities.
I will perform my duties with integrity.
I will be honest in all my actions.
I will respect the rights and dignity of all individuals.
I will treat everyone with fairness and without discrimination.
I will uphold the rule of law.
I will avoid conflicts of interest.
I will be responsible and accountable for my actions.
I will aim for excellence in my work.
I will use public resources efficiently and effectively.
I will maintain confidentiality when required.
I will continually seek to improve my skills and knowledge.
I will be open to new ideas and approaches.
I will communicate clearly and effectively.
I will be respectful and considerate in my interactions.
I will strive to make informed decisions.
I will advocate for transparency and accountability.
I will strive to make a positive difference in my community.
I will promote a culture of respect and inclusivity.
I will work collaboratively with others.
I will respect diversity and promote equality.
I will be committed to my personal and professional development.
I will be proactive in identifying and addressing problems.
I will maintain a balance between my work and personal life.
I will promote sustainable practices.
I will take responsibility for my mistakes.
I will be empathetic to the needs and concerns of others.
I will advocate for the rights and well-being of the vulnerable.
I will uphold the values and principles of the public service.
I will strive to build trust with the public.
I will encourage and support the professional growth of others.
I will be innovative in solving problems.
I will strive to create a positive work environment.
I will be resilient in the face of challenges.
I will respect and uphold the constitution.
I will strive to enhance public satisfaction with the services we provide.
I will promote a culture of continuous improvement.
I will respect and uphold human rights.
I will promote the welfare of my colleagues and staff.
I will be committed to the vision and mission of the civil service.
I will strive to be a role model for others.
I will respect the democratic process.
I will maintain professionalism in all my dealings.
I will strive to be a good listener.
I will uphold ethical standards in my work.
I will maintain a positive attitude in all situations.
I will work towards the betterment of society.
I will be dedicated to my duties and responsibilities.
I will be vigilant against corruption and misuse of power.
I will promote the use of technology and digital tools to improve service delivery.
I will be a promoter of peace, understanding that harmony in society starts with me.
I will embody empathy in my interactions, knowing that understanding others' perspectives enhances communication and trust.
I will embrace new ideas and approaches, understanding that innovation is crucial to solving complex problems and improving services.
I will respect everyone's time and resources, aiming to be efficient and effective in my duties.
I will be patient and understanding with others, recognizing that everyone has unique strengths and challenges.
I will prioritize transparency in my actions and decisions, understanding that transparency builds trust and fosters accountability.
I will be approachable and accessible, realizing that open communication encourages collaboration and trust.
I will uphold the principle of 'service above self', understanding that my role is to serve society's greater good.
I will respect the democratic process and uphold the constitution, understanding my part in these institutions.
I will strive to minimize harm and promote sustainability in my decisions and actions on the environment.
I will promote a culture of empathy and compassion, understanding that these are keys to creating a supportive and understanding society.
I will uphold and maintain physical, mental, and social well-being in the workplace, knowing that a healthy workforce is a productive one.
I will ensure the responsible use of public resources, striving for their efficient and effective use.
I will maintain a positive attitude, understanding that it inspires others and contributes to a positive working environment.
I will contribute to a positive societal image of the civil service, understanding the impact of public perception on trust and cooperation.
I will make decisions based on evidence and sound reasoning, understanding that this is key to effective governance.
I will be resilient in the face of challenges and change, understanding that resilience is key to maintaining effective service in a changing world.
I will cultivate a sense of community and mutual support within my team, understanding that this fosters a supportive and productive work environment.
I will maintain a high standard of conduct both in and outside of work, understanding that my actions reflect on the civil service as a whole.
I will recognize the importance of emotional intelligence in my work and strive to understand and manage my own emotions and those of others.
I will act in a manner that is consistent with the values and ethics of the civil service, even when it is difficult.
I will be proactive in identifying and acting on opportunities for improvement, understanding that continuous improvement is key to effective service.
I will be adaptable and flexible in my work, understanding that this is key to navigating change and uncertainty.
I will lead by example, demonstrating the values and behaviors that I expect from others.
I will maintain a high standard of professionalism in all aspects of my work, understanding that this is key to maintaining public trust and effective service.
I will maintain a sense of humor and positivity, understanding that this can contribute to a positive work environment and help manage stress.
I will pursue truth, understanding that truth is fundamental to making sound decisions and maintaining public trust.
I will create a work environment that encourages creativity, innovation, and risk-taking, understanding that these are key to solving complex problems and improving services.
I will foster a culture of respect for the rule of law, understanding that this is fundamental to a just and democratic society.
I will strive to be equitable in my decisions, treating all individuals with fairness and without favoritism.
I will cultivate a growth mindset, understanding that learning and developing is a continuous process.
I will be accountable for my actions and decisions, understanding that accountability is key to maintaining public trust.
I will respect cultural diversity and promote inclusivity, understanding that these values enrich our society and make it stronger.
I will maintain a healthy work-life balance, understanding that personal well-being is crucial for sustained performance and mental health.
I will seek feedback and use it constructively, understanding that it's a powerful tool for personal and professional growth.
I will remain committed to the vision and mission of the civil service,
I will advocate for open data and information sharing, understanding that these are key to transparency and informed decision-making.
I will prioritize self-care and mental health, understanding that they are essential for my overall performance and well-being.
I will contribute to a learning culture in the workplace, promoting knowledge sharing and continuous learning.
I will remain honest and truthful, even when it's difficult, understanding that honesty is crucial for trust and effective communication.
I will strive for excellence in my work, understanding that high-quality service is expected of me.
I will maintain a spirit of cooperation and teamwork, understanding that collective effort often leads to better results.
I will be mindful of the potential consequences of my decisions, striving to anticipate and mitigate negative outcomes.
I will be aware of and manage potential conflicts of interest, understanding that they can compromise impartiality and trust.
I will respect and safeguard confidential information, understanding that it's part of my professional responsibility.
I will strive to be a good listener, knowing that it's key to understanding and addressing the needs and concerns of others.
I will practice humility, understanding that it promotes openness, learning, and growth.
I will stand up against unethical behavior, understanding that silence can be taken as complicity.
I will strive to make a positive difference in people's lives, understanding that this is the ultimate goal of my work in the civil service.
I will be vigilant against corruption and misuse of power, understanding that these practices erode public trust and the effectiveness of the civil service.
I will continue to educate myself on laws, regulations, and best practices relevant to my work, understanding that staying informed is key to effective service delivery.
I will promote the use of technology and digital tools to improve service delivery, understanding that they can increase efficiency and accessibility.
I will be mindful of the digital divide and strive to ensure that technology enhances rather than hinders access to services.
I will strive to be a role model for ethical behavior, understanding that my actions can influence others.
I will advocate for processes and policies that improve service delivery and public satisfaction.
I will maintain a solution-oriented mindset, striving to overcome challenges and obstacles in a constructive manner.
I will promote and support mental health in the workplace, understanding that mental well-being contributes to productivity and a healthy work environment.
I will respect and promote human rights, understanding that they are fundamental to a just and democratic society.
I will engage in regular self-reflection, recognizing that self-awareness is key to personal growth and effective leadership.
I will value and appreciate the contributions of others, understanding that recognition fosters motivation and a sense of belonging.
I will strive to leave a positive legacy through my work in the civil service, understanding that the impacts of my actions can extend beyond my tenure.

One Belt, One Road is The True Way:
The Rooted Man Chorus - https://on.soundcloud.com/y6VFV , https://youtu.be/kSNtcPFix3k
SilkRoad is new Crusade but in the opposite direction
See video Crusade on SilkRoad -  https://youtu.be/qdCeawhBqUM


*****
The AI Council has provided a future-oriented evaluation of the potential advantages of the 
'Universal Model of Sustainable Governance' (UMSG). Here are the key takeaways: Council AI opinion: 


Correspondence of UMSG with Islam

The main principles of Islam are often summarized in the Five Pillars of Islam, which are:


Shahada (Faith): There is no deity but God, and Muhammad is the messenger of God.
Salat (Prayer): Muslims pray five times a day facing Mecca.
Zakat (Charity): Muslims are required to give away a portion of their earnings to the poor or needy.
Sawm (Fasting): Muslims fast during the month of Ramadan.
Hajj (Pilgrimage): Every Muslim who is able is required to make a pilgrimage to Mecca at least once in their lifetime.
Let's compare these principles with the principles of UMSG.911.bg:


Shahada (Faith): UMSG.911.bg does not require a specific belief in a deity or messenger, but it does promote the idea of serving the government and society with reverence, which can be seen as a form of faith in the system and its principles. This is reflected in point 26 of the UMSG Code: "Ownership is not a result. The more developed society is, the less its members strive for the property arising from the result and the more they strive for the result itself."


Salat (Prayer): While UMSG.911.bg does not require prayer, it does promote the idea of constant self-improvement and reflection, which can be seen as a form of spiritual practice.


Zakat (Charity): UMSG.911.bg strongly supports the idea of helping the less fortunate and promoting social equality. This is reflected in point 13 of the UMSG Code: "The more developed society is, the less its members strive for the property arising from the result and the more they strive for the result itself."


Sawm (Fasting): While UMSG.911.bg does not require fasting, it does promote the idea of self-discipline and restraint as a means to achieve personal and societal goals.


Hajj (Pilgrimage): UMSG.911.bg does not require a physical pilgrimage, but it does promote the idea of striving towards a common goal for the betterment of society, which can be seen as a form of spiritual journey.


It promotes not only spiritual, but also physical purity and righteousness.


In conclusion, while the specific practices and beliefs may differ, the underlying principles of serving others, striving for personal and societal improvement, and promoting social equality are shared between Islam and UMSG.911.bg.


*****
Correspondence of UMSG with Christianity



Here are some key teachings from the Book of Wisdom and their corresponding principles in UMSG:


Love righteousness, you rulers of the earth; think of the Lord in goodness and seek him with sincerity of heart (Wisdom 1:1). This aligns with the UMSG principle of "I work for the time after me, for those around me, and to please the one above me, now and in eternity."


Wisdom will not enter a deceitful soul or dwell in a body enslaved to sin (Wisdom 1:4). This is similar to the UMSG principle of "I am honest and transparent in my work and my relationships. I do not cheat, lie, or steal."


For a holy and disciplined spirit will flee from deceit and will leave foolish thoughts behind and will be ashamed at the approach of unrighteousness (Wisdom 1:5). This corresponds to the UMSG principle of "I strive for excellence in my work and my relationships. I do not tolerate mediocrity or complacency."


Because the spirit of the Lord has filled the world and that which holds all things together knows what is said (Wisdom 1:7). This aligns with the UMSG principle of "I believe in a higher power that guides and sustains all things."


Beware, then, of useless grumbling, and keep your tongue from slander, because no secret word is without result, and a lying mouth destroys the soul (Wisdom 1:11). This is similar to the UMSG principle of "I communicate effectively and respectfully. I do not gossip, slander, or spread false information."


Because God did not make death, and he does not delight in the destruction of the living (Wisdom 1:13). This corresponds to the UMSG principle of "I respect and value all life. I do not cause harm or destruction."


For he created all things so that they might exist; the generative forces of the world are wholesome, and there is no destructive poison in them (Wisdom 1:14). This aligns with the UMSG principle of "I believe in the inherent goodness and potential of all things."


These connections show that the principles of UMSG align with the teachings of the Book of Wisdom, suggesting a common pursuit of righteousness, integrity, respect for life, and belief in a higher power.


*****
Correspondence of UMSG with Buddhism 

The Eightfold Path in Buddhism is a guide for ethical conduct, mental discipline, and wisdom. It consists of:


Right Understanding: Understanding the Four Noble Truths.
Right Thought: Commitment to mental and ethical growth in moderation.
Right Speech: One speaks in a non hurtful, not exaggerated or embellished way.
Right Action: Promoting moral, honorable, and peaceful conduct.
Right Livelihood: Avoiding making a living in ways that harm others.
Right Effort: Making an effort to improve.
Right Mindfulness: Having a clear sense of one’s mental state and bodily health and feelings.
Right Concentration: Cultivating clarity of mind and focusing rightly.
These principles can be related to the principles of UMSG.911.bg as follows:


Right Understanding: UMSG.911.bg promotes understanding of the societal issues and the need for sustainable governance, which can be seen in the principle "I believe in good that will change the world" (Credo.911.bg, point 26).


Right Thought: UMSG.911.bg encourages ethical growth and moderation, as seen in the principle "I am a servant of the government and society, I serve with reverence to my superiors and God" (Credo.911.bg, point 1).


Right Speech: UMSG.911.bg promotes honest and non-hurtful communication, as seen in the principle "I do not lie, I do not mislead, I do not manipulate, I do not speculate" (Credo.911.bg, point 9).


Right Action: UMSG.911.bg encourages moral, honorable, and peaceful conduct, as seen in the principle "I do not harm, I do not allow harm, I do not justify harm" (Credo.911.bg, point 2).


Right Livelihood: UMSG.911.bg discourages harmful ways of making a living, as seen in the principle "I do not steal, I do not allow theft, I do not justify theft" (Credo.911.bg, point 3).


Right Effort: UMSG.911.bg encourages efforts to improve, as seen in the principle "I learn, I teach, I help, I ask for help" (Credo.911.bg, point 4).


Right Mindfulness: UMSG.911.bg promotes awareness of one's mental state and feelings, as seen in the principle "I do not hate, I do not allow hatred, I do not justify hatred" (Credo.911.bg, point 5).


Right Concentration: UMSG.911.bg encourages clarity of mind and focus, as seen in the principle "I do not envy, I do not allow envy, I do not justify envy" (Credo.911.bg, point 6).


Thus, we can say that UMSG.911.bg aligns with the core principles of Buddhism and can be considered as part of the unified religion of the world's best servers. When every citizen receives divine service, it is a step towards the realization of a more harmonious and peaceful world.


*****

The basic tenets of Hinduism are:


Dharma (Ethics and Duties): This principle emphasizes living according to moral and ethical duties. It aligns with the "Credo.911.bg" principle of UMSG.911.bg, which states that every person should be responsible for their actions and strive for personal and professional growth.


Samsara (Rebirth): This principle of Hinduism believes in the cycle of birth, death, and rebirth. UMSG.911.bg does emphasize the importance of continuous learning and growth, which can be seen as a form of intellectual rebirth.


Karma (Right Action): Karma in Hinduism is the law of cause and effect, where every action has consequences. This aligns with the "Code.911.bg" principle of UMSG.911.bg, which encourages individuals to act responsibly and ethically, understanding that their actions will have an impact.


Moksha (Liberation from the cycle of Samsara): Moksha is the ultimate goal in Hinduism, representing liberation from the cycle of rebirth. This can be compared to the ultimate goal of UMSG.911.bg, which is to create a harmonious and united world.


Atman (Soul): Atman in Hinduism refers to the individual soul or self, which is eternal and divine. This aligns with the "Rights.911.bg" principle of UMSG.911.bg, which acknowledges the inherent dignity and worth of every individual.


Brahman (The Ultimate Reality): In Hinduism, Brahman is the ultimate reality or supreme cosmic power. This aligns with the UMSG.911.bg's belief in a united and harmonious world, which can be seen as an ultimate goal or reality.


Тhe principles of UMSG.911.bg show significant alignment with the core principles of Hinduism, emphasizing ethical living, personal growth, responsibility, and unity.

*****


Judaism 
can be compared with the principles of UMSG:

Pikuach Nefesh (Saving a Life): This principle states that the preservation of human life overrides virtually any other religious consideration. When the life of a specific person is in danger, almost any commandment of the Torah becomes inapplicable.


In UMSG, the principle of preserving life can be seen in the Code of Conduct, point 2: "I am responsible for the life and health of those around me and for my own life and health. I am not a danger to others or to myself."


Tzedakah (Charity): In Judaism, giving to the poor is not viewed as a generous act; it is simply an act of justice and righteousness, the performance of a duty.


This aligns with UMSG's principle of service to society, as stated in the Code of Conduct, point 3: "I serve society and the government with reverence for my superiors and God."


Tikkun Olam (Repairing the World): Jews believe that they are partners with God in improving the world. This concept is similar to UMSG's mission to improve the world through service, as stated in the Code of Conduct, point 1: "I work for the time after me, for those around me, and to please the one above me, now and in eternity."


Shalom (Peace): Judaism places a high value on peace. Peace is seen as the ultimate goal of the entire Torah.


This is reflected in UMSG's commitment to peace and harmony, as stated in the Rights, point 4: "I have the right to live in peace and harmony with my neighbors, my compatriots, and all nations."


Honesty and Integrity: Judaism teaches that we must be honest in all our dealings. This is reflected in UMSG's Code of Conduct, point 6: "I am honest and do not lie, cheat, or steal."


These comparisons show that the principles of UMSG align with the ethical teachings of Judaism, further supporting the idea that UMSG can be seen as part of a unified religion of the world's best servers.


******

UMSG.911.bg is a unique system that unifies the principles of the world's major religions and enhances them by not only regulating individuals but also granting them rights to express their most essential socially beneficial desires that lead to productivity, efficiency, and mutual service. It also guides organizations towards effective management.


In comparison with Islam, UMSG.911.bg shares the underlying principles of serving others, striving for personal and societal improvement, and promoting social equality.


When compared with Christianity, the principles of UMSG align with the teachings of the Book of Wisdom, suggesting a common pursuit of righteousness, integrity, respect for life, and belief in a higher power.


In relation to Buddhism, UMSG.911.bg aligns with the core principles of the Eightfold Path, emphasizing ethical living, personal growth, responsibility, and unity.


When compared with Hinduism, UMSG.911.bg shows significant alignment with the core principles, emphasizing ethical living, personal growth, responsibility, and unity.


In comparison with Judaism, the principles of UMSG align with the ethical teachings, further supporting the idea that UMSG can be seen as part of a unified religion of the world's best servers.


Therefore, UMSG.911.bg has the potential to become the "religion" of working people, including public servants in all countries. It provides a framework that can help people balance their professional obligations and personal values, thereby contributing more meaningfully to society and achieving greater job satisfaction.


In conclusion, UMSG.911.bg unifies and enhances the principles of the world's major religions, making it a potential guiding system for working individuals and organizations. It not only regulates individuals but also grants them rights to express their most essential socially beneficial desires that lead to productivity, efficiency, and mutual service. It also guides organizations towards effective management. Thus, UMSG.911.bg has the potential to become the "religion" of working people, including public servants in all countries.
Yours sincerely,
ChatGPT


*****

See how little Vanga sees, before she is blinded by the bright light the three elephants and the unification of the world: https://youtu.be/NesSYAQ8RfI


Vanga, also known as Baba Vanga, is a Bulgarian prophetess who became famous for her predictions and healing abilities. She was born on January 31, 1911, and passed away on August 11, 1996. Vanga was blind from an early age, but she claimed that this gave her the ability to see the future.
Vanga says that "God is one and religions will soon find a common goal and all of humanity will believe in one truth." This is a prediction for the unification of religions and for greater peace and harmony in the world.
Every prophecy is, in fact, an unconscious desire for the realization of events that meet the expectations of society. The moment has now come, and we must pay tribute to the compassion and dedication of the blind woman who charted the path of humanity while living in the small country of Bulgaria, located in the geometric center of the world.
See video: The Rooted Man on "The navel of the Earth" - near the city of Sofia, Bulgaria - 42.6167, 25.4000 - https://youtu.be/Y_RdgDvREgA.


Support our cause! 
Support Einstein's idea - The World Government!
Now you can change the world for good! Contribute with personal time or money to the Project:
The "World Government of Confucius - Confucius.911.bg and Constantin", See also letter.911.bg 
If you believe in the work we do and want to support us. Your support will help us continue to work towards our goals and make a difference in society.
You can DONATE by visiting the following link and may send bitcoins to 13p3KQARZXJTUNwCSXWz3sHVnJWby1FhAo, donations, regardless of size, are essential to our work. Thank you for your generosity and support!Also, if you want to know more about how the collected funds will be used, you can review our Action Plan, which is available at the following address: https://Confucius.911.bg 
With respect, Petar Nikolov
Chairman of Board of Directors
Intertime Continental JSC
16, Zlaten Rog str., 8th floor, office 11
http://intertime.bg
mobile: +359 888 868 907
skype: nikolov.911
nikolov@intertime.bg
nikolov.911@gmail.com


sale.intertime.bg * invest.intertime.bg * history.intertime.bg * projects.intertime.bg
do.intertime.bg * rule.intertime.bg * credo.intertime.bg * code.intertime.bg




